4594 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: разом
  EN TS: They are crying together!
  ua TS: Вони плачуть разом!
  EN FS: They are dancing together!
  ua FS: Вони танцюють разом!
  EN TP: crying together
  ua TP: плачуть разом
  EN FP: singing together
  ua FP: співають разом
4595 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: плакати
  EN TS: He can't stop crying.
  ua TS: Він не може перестати плакати.
  EN FS: He can't stop laughing.
  ua FS: Він не може перестати сміятися.
  EN TP: crying on the sofa
  ua TP: плаче на дивані
  EN FP: crying in the shower
  ua FP: плаче в душі
4596 | nose (noun): the organ of smell in the middle of the face | loc: ніс
  EN TS: She is blowing her nose.
  ua TS: Вона сякає ніс.
  EN FS: She is blowing a bubble.
  ua FS: Вона видуває бульбашку.
  EN TP: blowing her nose
  ua TP: сякає ніс
  EN FP: holding her nose
  ua FP: затискає ніс
4597 | culture (noun): the tastes in art and manners of a social group | loc: культура
  EN TS: This culture loves dancing.
  ua TS: Ця культура обожнює танці.
  EN FS: This culture loves football.
  ua FS: Ця культура обожнює футбол.
  EN TP: a folk culture festival
  ua TP: фестиваль народної культури
  EN FP: a culture of fast food
  ua FP: культура фастфуду
4598 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: величезний
  EN TS: Her coffee mug is huge now!
  ua TS: Її чашка для кави тепер величезна!
  EN FS: Her teapot is huge now!
  ua FS: Її чайник тепер величезний!
  EN TP: a huge coffee mug
  ua TP: величезна чашка для кави
  EN FP: a huge coffee bill
  ua FP: величезний рахунок за каву
4599 | payment (noun): a sum of money paid | loc: платіж
  EN TS: Payment in coins and notes.
  ua TS: Платіж монетами й купюрами.
  EN FS: Payment in notes only.
  ua FS: Платіж лише купюрами.
  EN TP: a payment in cash
  ua TP: платіж готівкою
  EN FP: a payment by card
  ua FP: платіж карткою
4600 | exchange (verb): to give something and receive something back | loc: обміняти
  EN TS: He is exchanging money.
  ua TS: Він обмінює гроші.
  EN FS: He is exchanging hats.
  ua FS: Він обмінює капелюхи.
  EN TP: exchanging foreign money
  ua TP: обмінює іноземну валюту
  EN FP: exchanging gifts
  ua FP: обмінюється подарунками
4601 | arrange (verb): to put things into a proper order | loc: впорядкувати
  EN TS: She is arranging the cushions.
  ua TS: Вона впорядковує подушки.
  EN FS: She is arranging the books.
  ua FS: Вона впорядковує книжки.
  EN TP: arranging sofa cushions
  ua TP: впорядковує диванні подушки
  EN FP: arranging a meeting
  ua FP: призначає зустріч
4602 | search (verb): to search or seek something | loc: обшукувати
  EN TS: Customs is searching her bag.
  ua TS: Митниця обшукує її сумку.
  EN FS: Customs is searching her car.
  ua FS: Митниця обшукує її авто.
  EN TP: searching a suitcase
  ua TP: обшукують валізу
  EN FP: searching for a lost dog
  ua FP: шукають загубленого пса
4603 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: дорога
  EN TS: The road winds through hills.
  ua TS: Дорога в'ється між пагорбами.
  EN FS: The road winds through a city.
  ua FS: Дорога в'ється через місто.
  EN TP: a winding mountain road
  ua TP: звивиста гірська дорога
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  ua FP: звивиста гірська річка
4605 | wire (noun): a metal line that carries electricity | loc: дріт
  EN TS: The wire is sparking.
  ua TS: Дріт іскрить.
  EN FS: The wheel is sparking.
  ua FS: Колесо іскрить.
  EN TP: an overhead tram wire
  ua TP: трамвайний дріт над вулицею
  EN FP: a farm wire fence
  ua FP: дротяний паркан на фермі
4606 | tower (noun): a tall narrow building or part of one | loc: вежа
  EN TS: He is looking up at a tower.
  ua TS: Він дивиться вгору на вежу.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  ua FS: Він дивиться вгору на літак.
  EN TP: a clock on a tower
  ua TP: годинник на вежі
  EN FP: a clock on a wall
  ua FP: годинник на стіні
4607 | copper (noun): a reddish-brown metal that bends easily | loc: мідь
  EN TS: Big copper tanks behind her.
  ua TS: За нею великі чани з міді.
  EN FS: Big plastic tanks behind her.
  ua FS: За нею великі чани з пластику.
  EN TP: shiny copper brewing tanks
  ua TP: блискучі пивоварні чани з міді
  EN FP: copper coins in a jar
  ua FP: мідні монети в банці
4608 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: натовп
  EN TS: The whole crowd is vibing!
  ua TS: Весь натовп кайфує!
  EN FS: The whole crowd is sleeping!
  ua FS: Весь натовп спить!
  EN TP: a huge dancing crowd
  ua TP: величезний натовп на танцполі
  EN FP: a football crowd
  ua FP: натовп на футболі
4610 | dad (noun): an informal word for father | loc: тато
  EN TS: Dad is ready to catch her!
  ua TS: Тато готовий її зловити!
  EN FS: Mom is ready to catch her!
  ua FS: Мама готова її зловити!
  EN TP: jumping into dad's arms
  ua TP: стрибок татові в обійми
  EN FP: running away from dad
  ua FP: втеча від тата
4611 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: донька
  EN TS: Her daughter drew the family.
  ua TS: Її донька намалювала сім'ю.
  EN FS: Her daughter drew a horse.
  ua FS: Її донька намалювала коня.
  EN TP: a daughter baking with mom
  ua TP: донька пече з мамою
  EN FP: a daughter shopping with mom
  ua FP: донька на шопінгу з мамою
4612 | sell (verb): to give something in exchange for money | loc: продавати
  EN TS: He sells the best peaches.
  ua TS: Він продає найкращі персики.
  EN FS: He sells the best apples.
  ua FS: Він продає найкращі яблука.
  EN TP: selling peaches at a market
  ua TP: продає персики на ринку
  EN FP: selling apples at a market
  ua FP: продає яблука на ринку
4613 | earth (noun): the loose soft material of the land surface | loc: земля
  EN TS: He is turning the dark earth.
  ua TS: Він перекопує темну землю.
  EN FS: He is turning the white sand.
  ua FS: Він перекопує білий пісок.
  EN TP: turning the dark earth
  ua TP: перекопує темну землю
  EN FP: digging in the sand
  ua FP: копає в піску
4614 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: висіти | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc висіти is intransitive; used transitive вішати
  EN TS: He is hanging a paper garland.
  ua TS: Він вішає паперову гірлянду.
  EN FS: He is hanging a paper lantern.
  ua FS: Він вішає паперовий ліхтарик.
  EN TP: hanging party decorations
  ua TP: вішає святкові прикраси
  EN FP: hanging the washing
  ua FP: вішає білизну
4615 | colorful (adjective): having striking, bright color | loc: барвистий
  EN TS: This room is super colorful.
  ua TS: Ця кімната прям дуже барвиста.
  EN FS: This room is super grey.
  ua FS: Ця кімната прям дуже сіра.
  EN TP: colorful party balloons
  ua TP: барвисті повітряні кульки
  EN FP: colorful Easter eggs
  ua FP: барвисті писанки
4616 | wood (noun): a large area densely covered with trees | loc: ліс
  EN TS: A wild stag in a misty wood.
  ua TS: Дикий олень у туманному лісі.
  EN FS: A wild boar in a misty wood.
  ua FS: Дикий кабан у туманному лісі.
  EN TP: a stag in the wood
  ua TP: олень у лісі
  EN FP: a table made of wood
  ua FP: стіл із дерева
4617 | fight (verb): to be engaged in a fight | loc: битися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Men in armour are fighting.
  ua TS: Чоловіки в обладунках б'ються.
  EN FS: Men in suits are fighting.
  ua FS: Чоловіки в костюмах б'ються.
  EN TP: fighting with shields
  ua TP: б'ються зі щитами
  EN FP: fighting over a parking space
  ua FP: б'ються за паркомісце
4618 | charge (noun): a sudden rush toward someone or something | loc: атака
  EN TS: Here comes the charge!
  ua TS: Ось і атака!
  EN FS: Here comes the rain!
  ua FS: Ось і дощ!
  EN TP: a charge with shields
  ua TP: атака зі щитами
  EN FP: a charge for extra bags
  ua FP: плата за додатковий багаж
4619 | raw (adjective): not processed or cooked, in a simple natural state | loc: сирий
  EN TS: Raw chicken, raw fish, no dinner yet.
  ua TS: Сира курка, сира риба, вечері ще нема.
  EN FS: Raw chicken, raw beef, no dinner yet.
  ua FS: Сира курка, сира яловичина, вечері ще нема.
  EN TP: a raw frozen chicken
  ua TP: сира заморожена курка
  EN FP: a raw egg
  ua FP: сире яйце
4620 | overnight (adverb): during or for one night | loc: протягом ночі
  EN TS: He is sleeping here overnight.
  ua TS: Він спить тут протягом ночі.
  EN FS: He is working here overnight.
  ua FS: Він працює тут протягом ночі.
  EN TP: stuck overnight at an airport
  ua TP: застряг в аеропорту на ніч
  EN FP: an overnight train journey
  ua FP: нічна поїздка потягом
4621 | passenger (noun): a traveler riding in a vehicle, not driving it | loc: пасажир
  EN TS: The passengers look like the flight is never coming.
  ua TS: Пасажири мають такий вигляд, ніби рейсу вже не буде.
  EN FS: The pilots look like the flight is never coming.
  ua FS: Пілоти мають такий вигляд, ніби рейсу вже не буде.
  EN TP: tired passengers waiting
  ua TP: втомлені пасажири чекають
  EN FP: passengers on a plane
  ua FP: пасажири в літаку
4622 | sigh (verb): to breathe out deeply and heavily | loc: зітхнути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sighing at the ceiling.
  ua TS: Вона зітхає, дивлячись у стелю.
  EN FS: She is sighing at the window.
  ua FS: Вона зітхає, дивлячись у вікно.
  EN TP: sighing at the gate
  ua TP: зітхає біля гейта
  EN FP: sighing with relief
  ua FP: зітхає з полегшенням
4623 | vote (noun): a choice made by counting people in favor | loc: голос
  EN TS: The votes are falling out.
  ua TS: Голоси висипаються.
  EN FS: The coins are falling out.
  ua FS: Монети висипаються.
  EN TP: counting the votes
  ua TP: підрахунок голосів
  EN FP: casting a vote
  ua FP: віддати свій голос
4624 | majority (noun): more than half of the votes | loc: більшість
  EN TS: A clear majority!
  ua TS: Явна більшість!
  EN FS: A clear minority!
  ua FS: Явна меншість!
  EN TP: a clear majority
  ua TP: явна більшість
  EN FP: a majority of empty chairs
  ua FP: більшість порожніх стільців
4625 | vote (verb): to express your choice for a candidate | loc: голосувати
  EN TS: She is voting like a champion!
  ua TS: Вона голосує як чемпіонка!
  EN FS: He is voting like a champion!
  ua FS: Він голосує як чемпіон!
  EN TP: voting with joy
  ua TP: голосує з радістю
  EN FP: voting by post
  ua FP: голосує поштою
4627 | leave (verb): to go away from a place | loc: піти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone leaves. He waves!
  ua TS: Усі пішли. А він махає!
  EN FS: Everyone stays. He waves!
  ua FS: Усі лишилися. А він махає!
  EN TP: waving as the ship leaves
  ua TP: махає, поки корабель іде
  EN FP: leaving on a bike
  ua FP: поїхати на велосипеді
4628 | sad (adjective): feeling or showing unhappiness | loc: сумний
  EN TS: Picnic cancelled. He is sad.
  ua TS: Пікнік скасовано. Він сумний.
  EN FS: Picnic cancelled. She is sad.
  ua FS: Пікнік скасовано. Вона сумна.
  EN TP: sad about the rain
  ua TP: сумний через дощ
  EN FP: sad about the snow
  ua FP: сумний через сніг
4629 | endless (adjective): seeming to have no end, tiresomely long | loc: нескінченний
  EN TS: Endless sand, one tiny walker.
  ua TS: Нескінченний пісок, один крихітний мандрівник.
  EN FS: Endless sand, one tiny camel.
  ua FS: Нескінченний пісок, один крихітний верблюд.
  EN TP: endless rows of dunes
  ua TP: нескінченні ряди дюн
  EN FP: an endless queue of cars
  ua FP: нескінченна черга машин
4630 | haircut (noun): the shape and style your hair is cut in | loc: стрижка
  EN TS: He drew the haircut first.
  ua TS: Він спершу намалював стрижку.
  EN FS: He drew the beard first.
  ua FS: Він спершу намалював бороду.
  EN TP: a sharp fade haircut
  ua TP: стрижка з чітким фейдом
  EN FP: a haircut with long sides
  ua FP: стрижка з довгими боками
4631 | design (verb): to make or work out a plan for something | loc: спроєктувати
  EN TS: He designed a birdhouse.
  ua TS: Він спроєктував шпаківню.
  EN FS: He designed a dog house.
  ua FS: Він спроєктував будку для собаки.
  EN TP: designing a birdhouse
  ua TP: проєктує шпаківню
  EN FP: designing a website
  ua FP: проєктує вебсайт
4632 | workspace (noun): the desk area where you set up to work | loc: робоче місце
  EN TS: The workspace is now complete.
  ua TS: Робоче місце нарешті готове.
  EN FS: The kitchen is now complete.
  ua FS: Кухня нарешті готова.
  EN TP: setting up a workspace
  ua TP: облаштування робочого місця
  EN FP: sharing a workspace
  ua FP: спільне робоче місце
4633 | desperate (adjective): marked by despair or loss of hope | loc: зневірений
  EN TS: The old car made him desperate.
  ua TS: Стара машина зробила його зневіреним.
  EN FS: The old van made him desperate.
  ua FS: Старий фургон зробив його зневіреним.
  EN TP: desperate in the rain
  ua TP: зневірений під дощем
  EN FP: desperate for a coffee
  ua FP: зневірений без кави
4634 | reach (verb): to arrive at a destination | loc: дістатися
  EN TS: She reached the town at last!
  ua TS: Вона нарешті дісталася міста!
  EN FS: She reached the lake at last!
  ua FS: Вона нарешті дісталася озера!
  EN TP: reaching the seaside town
  ua TP: дістатися приморського містечка
  EN FP: reaching for the phone
  ua FP: тягнеться по телефон
4635 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: пункт призначення
  EN TS: She reached her destination.
  ua TS: Вона дісталася свого пункту призначення.
  EN FS: She reached her hotel.
  ua FS: Вона дісталася свого готелю.
  EN TP: reaching her destination
  ua TP: дістається пункту призначення
  EN FP: a destination by plane
  ua FP: переліт до пункту призначення
4636 | lighthouse (noun): a tall sea tower whose light guides ships | loc: маяк
  EN TS: She found the real lighthouse!
  ua TS: Вона знайшла справжній маяк!
  EN FS: She found the real castle!
  ua FS: Вона знайшла справжній замок!
  EN TP: a red-and-white lighthouse
  ua TP: червоно-білий маяк
  EN FP: a lighthouse in a storm
  ua FP: маяк у шторм
4637 | destroy (verb): to cause the destruction of something | loc: знищити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are destroying the house, and she films it.
  ua TS: Вони знищують будинок, а вона це знімає.
  EN FS: They are destroying the car, and she films it.
  ua FS: Вони знищують машину, а вона це знімає.
  EN TP: destroying an old house
  ua TP: знищують старий будинок
  EN FP: destroying an old car
  ua FP: знищують стару машину
4638 | rubble (noun): broken stones left when a building falls | loc: уламки
  EN TS: Bye, house. Now it is rubble.
  ua TS: Бувай, будинку. Тепер це уламки.
  EN FS: Bye, barn. Now it is rubble.
  ua FS: Бувай, сараю. Тепер це уламки.
  EN TP: a heap of rubble
  ua TP: купа уламків
  EN FP: clearing away the rubble
  ua FP: розбирають уламки
4639 | liquid (adjective): having the characteristics of a liquid, flowing | loc: рідкий
  EN TS: The liquid soap is blue-green.
  ua TS: Рідке мило синьо-зелене.
  EN FS: The liquid soap is bright red.
  ua FS: Рідке мило яскраво-червоне.
  EN TP: liquid soap pouring out
  ua TP: рідке мило ллється
  EN FP: liquid paint on a brush
  ua FP: рідка фарба на пензлі
4640 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: миючий засіб
  EN TS: Blue detergent, white shirt!
  ua TS: Синій миючий засіб, біла сорочка!
  EN FS: Pink detergent, white shirt!
  ua FS: Рожевий миючий засіб, біла сорочка!
  EN TP: pouring laundry detergent
  ua TP: наливає миючий засіб для прання
  EN FP: detergent for the dishes
  ua FP: миючий засіб для посуду
4641 | diet (noun): a chosen selection of foods to eat | loc: раціон
  EN TS: Goodbye, doughnuts. Hello, diet.
  ua TS: Прощавайте, пончики. Привіт, новий раціон.
  EN FS: Goodbye, salad. Hello, doughnuts.
  ua FS: Прощавай, салате. Привіт, пончики.
  EN TP: meal prep for a diet
  ua TP: контейнери зі здоровим раціоном
  EN FP: a diet of doughnuts
  ua FP: раціон із пончиків
4642 | pit (noun): a sizeable hole in the ground | loc: яма
  EN TS: Best pit ever. The dog helped.
  ua TS: Найкраща яма в житті. Пес допомагав.
  EN FS: Best pit ever. The cat helped.
  ua FS: Найкраща яма в житті. Кіт допомагав.
  EN TP: a deep sand pit
  ua TP: глибока яма в піску
  EN FP: a pit full of snakes
  ua FP: яма, повна змій
4643 | production (noun): a show made for stage, screen or radio | loc: постановка
  EN TS: The production is going well!
  ua TS: Постановка йде чудово!
  EN FS: The production is going badly!
  ua FS: Постановка йде жахливо!
  EN TP: a film production at home
  ua TP: кінопостановка вдома
  EN FP: a factory production line
  ua FP: виробнича лінія на заводі
4644 | excuse (noun): a defense of some bad behavior or failure | loc: відмовка
  EN TS: Work? What a bad excuse.
  ua TS: Робота? Яка кепська відмовка.
  EN FS: Rain? What a bad excuse.
  ua FS: Дощ? Яка кепська відмовка.
  EN TP: a bad excuse for leaving
  ua TP: кепська відмовка, щоб піти
  EN FP: an excuse for being late
  ua FP: відмовка за запізнення
4645 | attach (verb): to fasten something so it is attached | loc: прикріпити
  EN TS: Hands are attaching balls.
  ua TS: Руки прикріплюють кульки.
  EN FS: Hands are attaching wheels.
  ua FS: Руки прикріплюють колеса.
  EN TP: attaching balls to rods
  ua TP: прикріплює кульки до стрижнів
  EN FP: attaching rods to the wall
  ua FP: прикріплює стрижні до стіни
4646 | divorce (noun): the legal ending of a marriage | loc: розлучення
  EN TS: Rings off: this is a divorce.
  ua TS: Каблучки зняті: це розлучення.
  EN FS: Rings off: this is a wedding.
  ua FS: Каблучки зняті: це весілля.
  EN TP: rings left after a divorce
  ua TP: каблучки після розлучення
  EN FP: a divorce lawyer's office
  ua FP: кабінет адвоката з розлучень
4647 | to spin (verb): to turn round and round quickly | loc: крутитися
  EN TS: He spun too much. Floor time.
  ua TS: Він накрутився. Час полежати на підлозі.
  EN FS: He ran too much. Floor time.
  ua FS: Він набігався. Час полежати на підлозі.
  EN TP: spinning on an office chair
  ua TP: крутиться на офісному кріслі
  EN FP: spinning on a dance floor
  ua FP: крутиться на танцполі
4648 | examine (verb): to check someone's body for signs of illness | loc: оглянути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is examining a small boy.
  ua TS: Вона оглядає маленького хлопчика.
  EN FS: She is examining a small dog.
  ua FS: Вона оглядає маленького песика.
  EN TP: examining a worried boy
  ua TP: оглядає стривоженого хлопчика
  EN FP: examining a worried cat
  ua FP: оглядає стривоженого кота
4649 | teddy (noun): a child's toy bear, plush and stuffed | loc: плюшевий ведмедик
  EN TS: The teddy is braver than him.
  ua TS: Плюшевий ведмедик хоробріший за нього.
  EN FS: The puppy is braver than him.
  ua FS: Цуценя хоробріше за нього.
  EN TP: hugging a brown teddy
  ua TP: обіймає плюшевого ведмедика
  EN FP: hugging a brown puppy
  ua FP: обіймає коричневе цуценя
4650 | reaction (noun): a process in which substances change into others | loc: реакція
  EN TS: The reaction is making foam!
  ua TS: Реакція утворює піну!
  EN FS: The reaction is making smoke!
  ua FS: Реакція утворює дим!
  EN TP: a foaming chemical reaction
  ua TP: хімічна реакція з піною
  EN FP: a quick allergic reaction
  ua FP: швидка алергічна реакція
4651 | marine (adjective): relating to the sea | loc: морський
  EN TS: Marine life at sunset.
  ua TS: Морське життя на заході сонця.
  EN FS: Marine life at noon.
  ua FS: Морське життя опівдні.
  EN TP: marine animals jumping
  ua TP: морські тварини стрибають
  EN FP: a marine in uniform
  ua FP: морський піхотинець у формі
4652 | compete (verb): to take part in a contest against others | loc: змагатися
  EN TS: She is competing with a man.
  ua TS: Вона змагається з чоловіком.
  EN FS: She is competing with a child.
  ua FS: Вона змагається з дитиною.
  EN TP: competing at arm-wrestling
  ua TP: змагається в армреслінгу
  EN FP: competing in a cooking show
  ua FP: змагається в кулінарному шоу
4653 | mud (noun): soft wet earth, soil soaked with water | loc: багнюка
  EN TS: He left the mud on the mat. Mostly.
  ua TS: Він залишив багнюку на килимку. Переважно.
  EN FS: He left the snow on the mat. Mostly.
  ua FS: Він залишив сніг на килимку. Переважно.
  EN TP: boots covered in mud
  ua TP: черевики в багнюці
  EN FP: mud on the kitchen table
  ua FP: багнюка на кухонному столі
4654 | doubt (noun): the state of being unsure | loc: сумнів
  EN TS: She has doubts about it.
  ua TS: У неї є сумніви щодо цього.
  EN FS: She has no doubts about it.
  ua FS: У неї немає жодних сумнівів щодо цього.
  EN TP: doubts about a shelf
  ua TP: сумніви щодо полиці
  EN FP: doubts about the paint
  ua FP: сумніви щодо фарби
4655 | dress (verb): to put on clothes | loc: одягатися
  EN TS: He is dressing in a suit.
  ua TS: Він одягається в костюм.
  EN FS: He is dressing in a hoodie.
  ua FS: Він одягається в худі.
  EN TP: dressing in a suit
  ua TP: одягається в костюм
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  ua FP: заправляє салат
4656 | mount (verb): to attach something to a support | loc: закріпити
  EN TS: She mounted two shelves.
  ua TS: Вона закріпила дві полиці.
  EN FS: She mounted two mirrors.
  ua FS: Вона закріпила два дзеркала.
  EN TP: mounting shelves on a wall
  ua TP: закріплює полиці на стіні
  EN FP: mounting a horse
  ua FP: сідає на коня
4657 | to drink (verb): to take in liquids | loc: пити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is drinking coconut water.
  ua TS: Вона п'є кокосову воду.
  EN FS: She is drinking orange juice.
  ua FS: Вона п'є апельсиновий сік.
  EN TP: to drink through a straw
  ua TP: пити через соломинку
  EN FP: to drink from a tap
  ua FP: пити з-під крана
4658 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: керувати автомобілем
  EN TS: She is driving by the sea.
  ua TS: Вона керує автомобілем біля моря.
  EN FS: She is driving by a lake.
  ua FS: Вона керує автомобілем біля озера.
  EN TP: to drive along the coast
  ua TP: керувати автомобілем уздовж моря
  EN FP: to drive along a river
  ua FP: їхати вздовж річки
4659 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: машина
  EN TS: All these people are in cars.
  ua TS: Усі ці люди в машинах.
  EN FS: All these people are on bikes.
  ua FS: Усі ці люди на велосипедах.
  EN TP: people in their cars
  ua TP: люди у своїх машинах
  EN FP: people in their beds
  ua FP: люди у своїх ліжках
4660 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: купа
  EN TS: Her shopping is one big pile.
  ua TS: Її покупки — одна велика купа.
  EN FS: Her shopping is in one bag.
  ua FS: Її покупки — в одному пакеті.
  EN TP: a pile of boxes
  ua TP: купа коробок
  EN FP: a pile of laundry
  ua FP: купа білизни
4661 | fall (noun): the season when leaves fall from the trees | loc: осінь
  EN TS: Fall is here in the park!
  ua TS: Осінь прийшла в парк!
  EN FS: Spring is here in the park!
  ua FS: Весна прийшла в парк!
  EN TP: yellow leaves in the fall
  ua TP: жовте листя восени
  EN FP: fall fashion in a shop
  ua FP: осіння мода в магазині
4662 | supply (verb): to give something useful or necessary | loc: постачати
  EN TS: A plane is supplying the village.
  ua TS: Літак постачає селу припаси.
  EN FS: A truck is supplying the village.
  ua FS: Вантажівка постачає селу припаси.
  EN TP: supplying a village by air
  ua TP: постачати село з повітря
  EN FP: supplying a village by boat
  ua FP: постачати село човном
4663 | drop (noun): a small round shape, like a bead of liquid | loc: крапля
  EN TS: A drop is about to land.
  ua TS: Крапля от-от приземлиться.
  EN FS: A bee is about to land.
  ua FS: Бджола от-от приземлиться.
  EN TP: a single clear drop
  ua TP: одна прозора крапля
  EN FP: a drop of rain
  ua FP: крапля дощу
4664 | dose (noun): a measured portion of medicine taken at one time | loc: доза
  EN TS: She is counting the dose drop by drop.
  ua TS: Вона відмірює дозу крапля за краплею.
  EN FS: She is counting the dose spoon by spoon.
  ua FS: Вона відмірює дозу ложка за ложкою.
  EN TP: a dose of yellow oil
  ua TP: доза жовтої олії
  EN FP: a dose of cough syrup
  ua FP: доза сиропу від кашлю
4665 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: аварія
  EN TS: One accident after another!
  ua TS: Одна аварія за іншою!
  EN FS: One goal after another!
  ua FS: Один гол за іншим!
  EN TP: a run of small accidents
  ua TP: серія дрібних аварій
  EN FP: a car accident
  ua FP: автомобільна аварія
4666 | smash (verb): to hit something hard | loc: розбити
  EN TS: The pumpkin smashed. Oops!
  ua TS: Гарбуз розбився. Ой!
  EN FS: The egg smashed. Oops!
  ua FS: Яйце розбилося. Ой!
  EN TP: a pumpkin smashing on concrete
  ua TP: гарбуз розбивається об бетон
  EN FP: a pumpkin smashing a window
  ua FP: гарбуз розбиває вікно
4667 | plane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings and engines | loc: літак
  EN TS: The plane is dropping boxes. Air delivery!
  ua TS: Літак скидає коробки. Доставка з неба!
  EN FS: The plane is dropping letters. Air delivery!
  ua FS: Літак скидає листи. Доставка з неба!
  EN TP: a plane dropping crates
  ua TP: літак скидає ящики
  EN FP: a plane landing on grass
  ua FP: літак сідає на траву
4668 | to smell (verb): to inhale the odor of something | loc: нюхати
  EN TS: She is smelling the washing.
  ua TS: Вона нюхає випрану білизну.
  EN FS: She is ironing the washing.
  ua FS: Вона прасує випрану білизну.
  EN TP: smelling clean washing
  ua TP: нюхає чисту білизну
  EN FP: smelling the sea air
  ua FP: нюхає морське повітря
4669 | laundry (noun): garments that can be cleaned by washing | loc: білизна
  EN TS: Laundry with a sea view!
  ua TS: Білизна з видом на море!
  EN FS: Laundry with a city view!
  ua FS: Білизна з видом на місто!
  EN TP: white laundry on a line
  ua TP: біла білизна на мотузці
  EN FP: a bag of dirty laundry
  ua FP: мішок брудної білизни
4670 | roof (noun): the protective covering on top of a building | loc: дах
  EN TS: She is on the roof.
  ua TS: Вона на даху.
  EN FS: She is in the garden.
  ua FS: Вона в саду.
  EN TP: washing on a flat roof
  ua TP: білизна на пласкому даху
  EN FP: a cat on a roof
  ua FP: кіт на даху
4671 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: машина
  EN TS: The blanket is in the machine.
  ua TS: Ковдра в пральній машині.
  EN FS: The towel is in the machine.
  ua FS: Рушник у пральній машині.
  EN TP: a washing machine
  ua TP: пральна машина
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  ua FP: кавова машина
4672 | reed (noun): tall grasses with hollow slender stems | loc: очерет
  EN TS: Reeds grow at both edges.
  ua TS: Очерет росте по обох берегах.
  EN FS: Trees grow at both edges.
  ua FS: Дерева ростуть по обох берегах.
  EN TP: tall reeds by the water
  ua TP: високий очерет біля води
  EN FP: a woven reed basket
  ua FP: плетений кошик з очерету
4673 | weak (adjective): lacking physical strength | loc: слабкий
  EN TS: He is way too weak for it!
  ua TS: Він для цього ну надто слабкий!
  EN FS: He is way too strong for it!
  ua FS: Він для цього ну надто сильний!
  EN TP: a weak skinny arm
  ua TP: слабка худа рука
  EN FP: a weak cup of tea
  ua FP: слабкий чай
4674 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: полиця
  EN TS: He is dusting the shelves.
  ua TS: Він витирає пил з полиць.
  EN FS: He is painting the shelves.
  ua FS: Він фарбує полиці.
  EN TP: dusting the shelves
  ua TP: витирає пил з полиць
  EN FP: building the shelves
  ua FP: збирає полиці
4675 | careful (adjective): showing caution, care or attention | loc: обережний
  EN TS: He is not careful at all!
  ua TS: Він зовсім не обережний!
  EN FS: She is not careful at all!
  ua FS: Вона зовсім не обережна!
  EN TP: not careful on a bridge
  ua TP: необережний на мосту
  EN FP: careful with the tulips
  ua FP: обережно з тюльпанами
4676 | tradition (noun): a pattern of action passed down over time | loc: традиція
  EN TS: Carrying cheese is a tradition here.
  ua TS: Носити сир — тут традиція.
  EN FS: Carrying fish is a tradition here.
  ua FS: Носити рибу — тут традиція.
  EN TP: an old cheese tradition
  ua TP: стара сирна традиція
  EN FP: an old dance tradition
  ua FP: стара танцювальна традиція
4678 | eat (verb): to take in solid food | loc: їсти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is eating something.
  ua TS: Усі щось їдять.
  EN FS: Everyone is drinking tea.
  ua FS: Усі п'ють чай.
  EN TP: eating a triple burger
  ua TP: їсть потрійний бургер
  EN FP: eating a salad bowl
  ua FP: їсть миску салату
4679 | delicious (adjective): greatly pleasing to taste | loc: смачний
  EN TS: These tacos are delicious!
  ua TS: Ці тако такі смачні!
  EN FS: These burgers are delicious!
  ua FS: Ці бургери такі смачні!
  EN TP: two delicious tacos
  ua TP: два смачні тако
  EN FP: a delicious cold soup
  ua FP: смачний холодний суп
4680 | rider (noun): a traveler who rides an animal like a horse | loc: вершник
  EN TS: A rider is mounting a camel.
  ua TS: Вершник сідає на верблюда.
  EN FS: A rider is mounting a horse.
  ua FS: Вершник сідає на коня.
  EN TP: a rider mounting a camel
  ua TP: вершник сідає на верблюда
  EN FP: a rider on a horse
  ua FP: вершник на коні
4681 | lamp (noun): an artificial source of light | loc: лампа
  EN TS: So many glass lamps!
  ua TS: Скільки скляних ламп!
  EN FS: So many glass bottles!
  ua FS: Скільки скляних пляшок!
  EN TP: a blue glass lamp
  ua TP: синя скляна лампа
  EN FP: a blue glass vase
  ua FP: синя скляна ваза
4682 | trader (noun): someone who buys goods to sell them | loc: торговець
  EN TS: The trader is pouring spice.
  ua TS: Торговець насипає спеції.
  EN FS: The trader is pouring tea.
  ua FS: Торговець наливає чай.
  EN TP: a spice trader
  ua TP: торговець спеціями
  EN FP: a stock market trader
  ua FP: біржовий трейдер
4683 | rice (noun): grains used as food | loc: рис
  EN TS: Rice is all over the counter.
  ua TS: Рис розсипано по всій стільниці.
  EN FS: Salt is all over the counter.
  ua FS: Сіль розсипано по всій стільниці.
  EN TP: a bowl of cooked rice
  ua TP: миска вареного рису
  EN FP: a bag of raw rice
  ua FP: пакет сирого рису
4684 | elbow (noun): the joint between the forearm and upper arm | loc: лікоть | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Elbow bump: new handshake.
  ua TS: Привіт ліктем — нове рукостискання.
  EN FS: Fist bump: new handshake.
  ua FS: Привіт кулаком — нове рукостискання.
  EN TP: bumping elbows at work
  ua TP: вітання ліктями на роботі
  EN FP: elbows on the desk
  ua FP: лікті на столі
4685 | repair (verb): to fix something by replacing a broken part | loc: ремонтувати
  EN TS: He is repairing the fuse box.
  ua TS: Він ремонтує електрощиток.
  EN FS: He is repairing the car.
  ua FS: Він ремонтує машину.
  EN TP: repairing the fuse box
  ua TP: ремонтує електрощиток
  EN FP: repairing a flat tyre
  ua FP: ремонтує пробите колесо
4686 | repair (noun): the act of making something work again | loc: ремонт
  EN TS: Repair done, lights on!
  ua TS: Ремонт завершено, світло є!
  EN FS: Repair done, water on!
  ua FS: Ремонт завершено, вода є!
  EN TP: a repair in the dark
  ua TP: ремонт у темряві
  EN FP: a car repair shop
  ua FP: майстерня з ремонту авто
4687 | embassy (noun): a building where ambassadors live or work | loc: посольство
  EN TS: She is at the embassy.
  ua TS: Вона біля посольства.
  EN FS: She is inside the embassy.
  ua FS: Вона всередині посольства.
  EN TP: papers for the embassy
  ua TP: документи для посольства
  EN FP: an embassy party at night
  ua FP: вечірка в посольстві вночі
4688 | massive (adjective): imposing in size or bulk | loc: масивний
  EN TS: Just a massive whale, no big deal.
  ua TS: Просто масивний кит, нічого такого.
  EN FS: Just a massive shark, no big deal.
  ua FS: Просто масивна акула, нічого такого.
  EN TP: a massive humpback whale
  ua TP: масивний горбатий кит
  EN FP: a massive storm at sea
  ua FP: масивний шторм у морі
4689 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: човен
  EN TS: A whale next to the boat!
  ua TS: Кит поруч із човном!
  EN FS: A shark next to the boat!
  ua FS: Акула поруч із човном!
  EN TP: a whale by the boat
  ua TP: кит біля човна
  EN FP: a dolphin by the boat
  ua FP: дельфін біля човна
4690 | workplace (noun): a place where work is done | loc: робоче місце
  EN TS: His workplace is a cubicle.
  ua TS: Його робоче місце — кабінка.
  EN FS: His workplace is a kitchen.
  ua FS: Його робоче місце — кухня.
  EN TP: a busy open workplace
  ua TP: робоче місце в опенспейсі
  EN FP: a workplace on a farm
  ua FP: робоче місце на фермі
4691 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: колега
  EN TS: He is greeting a colleague.
  ua TS: Він вітається з колегою.
  EN FS: He is greeting a dog.
  ua FS: Він вітається з собакою.
  EN TP: greeting a colleague
  ua TP: вітається з колегою
  EN FP: a colleague on holiday
  ua FP: колега у відпустці
4692 | product (noun): goods offered for sale | loc: товар
  EN TS: He is shelving the products.
  ua TS: Він розкладає товари на полицях.
  EN FS: He is shelving the books.
  ua FS: Він розкладає книжки на полицях.
  EN TP: products on a shelf
  ua TP: товари на полиці
  EN FP: products in a truck
  ua FP: товари у вантажівці
4693 | hire (verb): to engage someone for work | loc: найняти
  EN TS: The boss just hired him.
  ua TS: Бос щойно його найняв.
  EN FS: The boss just fired him.
  ua FS: Бос щойно його звільнив.
  EN TP: hiring a new worker
  ua TP: наймає нового працівника
  EN FP: hiring a holiday car
  ua FP: бере авто напрокат
4694 | contract (noun): a binding agreement enforceable by law | loc: договір
  EN TS: He signed the contract!
  ua TS: Він підписав договір!
  EN FS: He tore up the contract!
  ua FS: Він розірвав договір!
  EN TP: signing a contract
  ua TP: підписання договору
  EN FP: reading a contract at home
  ua FP: читає договір удома
4695 | chaos (noun): a state of extreme confusion and disorder | loc: хаос
  EN TS: He made all this chaos.
  ua TS: Увесь цей хаос влаштував він.
  EN FS: He cleaned up all this chaos.
  ua FS: Увесь цей хаос прибрав він.
  EN TP: chaos on the floor
  ua TP: хаос на підлозі
  EN FP: chaos in the kitchen
  ua FP: хаос на кухні
4696 | encourage (verb): to inspire someone with confidence | loc: підбадьорити
  EN TS: They are encouraging her!
  ua TS: Вони її підбадьорюють!
  EN FS: They are laughing at her!
  ua FS: Вони з неї сміються!
  EN TP: encouraging a climber
  ua TP: підбадьорюють скелелазку
  EN FP: encouraging a child to read
  ua FP: заохочують дитину читати
4697 | start (noun): the beginning of anything | loc: початок
  EN TS: He has a lightning start!
  ua TS: У нього блискавичний початок!
  EN FS: He has a slow start!
  ua FS: У нього повільний початок!
  EN TP: a start from the blocks
  ua TP: початок зі стартових колодок
  EN FP: the start of school
  ua FP: початок навчального року
4698 | motor (noun): a machine that turns energy into motion | loc: двигун
  EN TS: What a huge motor!
  ua TS: Оце величезний двигун!
  EN FS: What a huge tyre!
  ua FS: Оце величезна шина!
  EN TP: a huge V8 motor
  ua TP: величезний двигун V8
  EN FP: a huge boat motor
  ua FP: величезний човновий мотор
4699 | machinery (noun): machines as a group | loc: техніка
  EN TS: He's inspecting the machinery.
  ua TS: Він оглядає техніку.
  EN FS: He is repairing the machinery.
  ua FS: Він ремонтує техніку.
  EN TP: old factory machinery
  ua TP: стара заводська техніка
  EN FP: old farm machinery
  ua FP: стара сільгосптехніка
4700 | robot (noun): a mechanism that can move automatically | loc: робот
  EN TS: The robot handed him a mug.
  ua TS: Робот подав йому кухоль.
  EN FS: The robot handed him a phone.
  ua FS: Робот подав йому телефон.
  EN TP: a robot holding a mug
  ua TP: робот тримає кухоль
  EN FP: a robot vacuum cleaner
  ua FP: робот-пилосос
4701 | ruin (verb): to destroy completely | loc: зруйнувати
  EN TS: The sea ruined it. Thanks, sea.
  ua TS: Море все зруйнувало. Дякую, море.
  EN FS: The dog ruined it. Thanks, dog.
  ua FS: Пес усе зруйнував. Дякую, песику.
  EN TP: a ruined sandcastle
  ua TP: зруйнований замок із піску
  EN FP: a ruined old church
  ua FP: зруйнована стара церква
4702 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: втекти
  EN TS: The goat escaped. Bye, farmer!
  ua TS: Коза втекла. Бувай, фермере!
  EN FS: The cow escaped. Bye, farmer!
  ua FS: Корова втекла. Бувай, фермере!
  EN TP: escaping from a goat pen
  ua TP: втекти із загону для кіз
  EN FP: escaping from a fox
  ua FP: втекти від лисиці
4703 | raise (verb): to move something from lower to higher | loc: підняти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is raising a green flag.
  ua TS: Він піднімає зелений прапор.
  EN FS: He is raising a red flag.
  ua FS: Він піднімає червоний прапор.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  ua TP: піднімає прапор
  EN FP: raising a child
  ua FP: виховує дитину
4704 | hat (noun): headwear that protects the head from bad weather | loc: капелюх
  EN TS: He wears a fur hat in a sauna!
  ua TS: Він у хутряному капелюсі в сауні!
  EN FS: He wears a cap in a sauna!
  ua FS: Він у кепці в сауні!
  EN TP: wearing a fur hat
  ua TP: у хутряному капелюсі
  EN FP: wearing a straw hat
  ua FP: у солом'яному капелюсі
4705 | band (noun): a group of people who play music together | loc: гурт
  EN TS: The whole town loves the band!
  ua TS: Усе місто обожнює цей гурт!
  EN FS: The whole town hates the band!
  ua FS: Усе місто ненавидить цей гурт!
  EN TP: a street band playing
  ua TP: вуличний гурт грає
  EN FP: a band in a stadium
  ua FP: гурт на стадіоні
4706 | to shout (verb): to speak in a loud voice | loc: кричати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The whole stadium is shouting.
  ua TS: Увесь стадіон кричить.
  EN FS: The whole stadium is sitting.
  ua FS: Увесь стадіон сидить.
  EN TP: fans shouting in a stadium
  ua TP: фанати кричать на стадіоні
  EN FP: shouting in a library
  ua FP: кричить у бібліотеці
4707 | patient (noun): a person who needs medical care | loc: пацієнт
  EN TS: Best patient ever. He smiles.
  ua TS: Найкращий пацієнт у світі. Він усміхається.
  EN FS: Best patient ever. He sleeps.
  ua FS: Найкращий пацієнт у світі. Він спить.
  EN TP: a patient with a nurse
  ua TP: пацієнт із медсестрою
  EN FP: a patient in an ambulance
  ua FP: пацієнт у швидкій
4708 | guide (verb): to direct the course of someone's travel | loc: супроводжувати
  EN TS: A man is guiding the group.
  ua TS: Чоловік супроводжує групу.
  EN FS: A dog is guiding the group.
  ua FS: Собака супроводжує групу.
  EN TP: guiding a tour group
  ua TP: супроводжує туристичну групу
  EN FP: guiding a ship into port
  ua FP: проводить корабель у порт
4709 | group (noun): a number of people or things taken as a unit | loc: група
  EN TS: The whole group is cheering!
  ua TS: Уся група радіє!
  EN FS: The whole group is crying!
  ua FS: Уся група плаче!
  EN TP: a group in matching hats
  ua TP: група в однакових капелюхах
  EN FP: a group in matching shirts
  ua FP: група в однакових футболках
4710 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: рука
  EN TS: They are swinging their arms.
  ua TS: Вони розмахують руками.
  EN FS: They are swinging their legs.
  ua FS: Вони розмахують ногами.
  EN TP: arms up over the head
  ua TP: руки вгору над головою
  EN FP: arms crossed over the chest
  ua FP: руки схрещені на грудях
4711 | effort (noun): the hard work you put into something | loc: зусилля
  EN TS: His face is pure effort.
  ua TS: Його обличчя — суцільне зусилля.
  EN FS: His face is pure boredom.
  ua FS: Його обличчя — суцільна нудьга.
  EN TP: rowing with full effort
  ua TP: гребе з усіх зусиль
  EN FP: running with full effort
  ua FP: біжить з усіх зусиль
4712 | blow (verb): to push air out of your mouth to move something | loc: дути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is blowing out all the candles!
  ua TS: Він дме й задуває всі свічки!
  EN FS: He is blowing up all the balloons!
  ua FS: Він дме й надуває всі кульки!
  EN TP: blowing out birthday candles
  ua TP: дме на свічки на торті
  EN FP: blowing up balloons
  ua FP: надуває повітряні кульки
4713 | goodbye (noun): a farewell remark | loc: прощання
  EN TS: They are waving goodbye.
  ua TS: Вони махають на прощання.
  EN FS: They are waving hello.
  ua FS: Вони махають на привітання.
  EN TP: waving goodbye from a quay
  ua TP: прощання на причалі
  EN FP: a goodbye letter
  ua FP: лист на прощання
4714 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: експерт
  EN TS: The expert says it's genuine.
  ua TS: Експерт каже, що це оригінал.
  EN FS: The expert says it's fake.
  ua FS: Експерт каже, що це підробка.
  EN TP: an expert with a vase
  ua TP: експерт із вазою
  EN FP: an expert with a car
  ua FP: експерт з автомобілем
4715 | watermelon (noun): a very big green fruit, red and juicy inside | loc: кавун
  EN TS: The watermelon exploded!
  ua TS: Кавун вибухнув!
  EN FS: The pumpkin exploded!
  ua FS: Гарбуз вибухнув!
  EN TP: a bursting watermelon
  ua TP: кавун лопається
  EN FP: a sliced watermelon
  ua FP: нарізаний кавун
4716 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: досліджувати
  EN TS: He is exploring the jungle like Indiana Jones.
  ua TS: Він досліджує джунглі, як Індіана Джонс.
  EN FS: He is exploring the desert like Indiana Jones.
  ua FS: Він досліджує пустелю, як Індіана Джонс.
  EN TP: exploring a jungle cave
  ua TP: досліджує печеру в джунглях
  EN FP: exploring a big city
  ua FP: досліджує велике місто
4717 | dark (adjective): without light or brightness | loc: темний
  EN TS: It is so dark in the tunnel!
  ua TS: Який темний тунель!
  EN FS: It is so dark in the house!
  ua FS: Який темний будинок!
  EN TP: a dark rock tunnel
  ua TP: темний тунель у скелі
  EN FP: a dark night sky
  ua FP: темне нічне небо
4718 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: око
  EN TS: Her brown eye fills the frame.
  ua TS: Її каре око заповнює весь кадр.
  EN FS: Her blue eye fills the frame.
  ua FS: Її блакитне око заповнює весь кадр.
  EN TP: a torch in an eye
  ua TP: ліхтарик світить в око
  EN FP: an eye behind glasses
  ua FP: око за окулярами
4719 | chin (noun): the part of the lower jaw that sticks out | loc: підборіддя
  EN TS: The chin is round.
  ua TS: Підборіддя кругле.
  EN FS: The chin is pointed.
  ua FS: Підборіддя гостре.
  EN TP: a rounded chin
  ua TP: округле підборіддя
  EN FP: a hand on the chin
  ua FP: рука на підборідді
4720 | funny (adjective): arousing laughter | loc: смішний
  EN TS: Funny faces and zero shame!
  ua TS: Смішні пики й нуль сорому!
  EN FS: Funny hats and zero shame!
  ua FS: Смішні шапки й нуль сорому!
  EN TP: funny faces for the phone
  ua TP: смішні пики для телефону
  EN FP: funny faces for the teacher
  ua FP: смішні пики для вчителя
4721 | fade (verb): to become less clearly visible | loc: згасати
  EN TS: Nooo, the rainbow is fading!
  ua TS: Ні-і-і, веселка згасає!
  EN FS: Nooo, the rainbow is growing!
  ua FS: Ні-і-і, веселка росте!
  EN TP: a rainbow fading away
  ua TP: веселка згасає
  EN FP: a photo fading away
  ua FP: фото вицвітає
4722 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: сонцезахисні окуляри
  EN TS: Even the women in sunglasses are fainting!
  ua TS: Навіть жінки в сонцезахисних окулярах непритомніють!
  EN FS: Even the women in sunglasses are dancing!
  ua FS: Навіть жінки в сонцезахисних окулярах танцюють!
  EN TP: women in dark sunglasses
  ua TP: жінки в сонцезахисних окулярах
  EN FP: sunglasses on a sunny beach
  ua FP: сонцезахисні окуляри на пляжі
4723 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: падати
  EN TS: People are falling into foam.
  ua TS: Люди падають у піну.
  EN FS: People are falling into water.
  ua FS: Люди падають у воду.
  EN TP: falling into a foam pit
  ua TP: падає в яму з піною
  EN FP: falling into a pool
  ua FP: падає в басейн
4724 | to laugh (verb): to produce laughter | loc: сміятися
  EN TS: She can't stop laughing.
  ua TS: Вона не може перестати сміятися.
  EN FS: She can't stop crying.
  ua FS: Вона не може перестати плакати.
  EN TP: laughing in a foam pit
  ua TP: сміється в ямі з піною
  EN FP: laughing in a ball pit
  ua FP: сміється в сухому басейні
4725 | pizza (noun): Italian bread dough baked with sauce and cheese | loc: піца
  EN TS: The whole family made pizza.
  ua TS: Уся родина робила піцу.
  EN FS: The whole family made pasta.
  ua FS: Уся родина робила пасту.
  EN TP: making pizza dough
  ua TP: місить тісто для піци
  EN FP: ordering pizza online
  ua FP: замовляє піцу онлайн
4726 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: фермер
  EN TS: The farmer is pulling carrots.
  ua TS: Фермер висмикує моркву.
  EN FS: The farmer is pulling onions.
  ua FS: Фермер висмикує цибулю.
  EN TP: a happy farmer at sunset
  ua TP: щасливий фермер на заході сонця
  EN FP: a tired farmer at dawn
  ua FP: втомлений фермер на світанку
4727 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: батько
  EN TS: This father never gets tired.
  ua TS: Цей батько ніколи не втомлюється.
  EN FS: This mother never gets tired.
  ua FS: Ця мати ніколи не втомлюється.
  EN TP: a father playing catch
  ua TP: батько грає в м'яча
  EN FP: a father watching TV
  ua FP: батько дивиться телевізор
4728 | sleep (verb): to be asleep | loc: спати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is sleeping on the sofa. Long day!
  ua TS: Вона спить на дивані. Важкий день!
  EN FS: She is sleeping on the floor. Long day!
  ua FS: Вона спить на підлозі. Важкий день!
  EN TP: sleeping on the sofa
  ua TP: спить на дивані
  EN FP: sleeping at work
  ua FP: спить на роботі
4729 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: наляканий
  EN TS: The mask made them afraid!
  ua TS: Через маску вони налякані!
  EN FS: The clown made them afraid!
  ua FS: Через клоуна вони налякані!
  EN TP: afraid in a haunted house
  ua TP: наляканий у будинку з привидами
  EN FP: afraid of a spider
  ua FP: наляканий павуком
4730 | committee (noun): a special group chosen to consider a matter | loc: комітет
  EN TS: The committee has nine people.
  ua TS: У комітеті дев'ятеро людей.
  EN FS: The committee has five people.
  ua FS: У комітеті п'ятеро людей.
  EN TP: a committee around a table
  ua TP: комітет за столом
  EN FP: a committee on a stage
  ua FP: комітет на сцені
4731 | nation (noun): a large group who share a country and an identity | loc: нація
  EN TS: Each nation's flag is rising.
  ua TS: Прапор кожної нації піднімається.
  EN FS: Each nation's flag is falling.
  ua FS: Прапор кожної нації опускається.
  EN TP: the flag of every nation
  ua TP: прапори всіх націй
  EN FP: the army of a nation
  ua FP: армія нації
4732 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: будувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is building a wooden fence.
  ua TS: Він будує дерев'яний паркан.
  EN FS: He is building a wooden shed.
  ua FS: Він будує дерев'яний сарай.
  EN TP: building a garden fence
  ua TP: будує паркан у саду
  EN FP: building a sandcastle
  ua FP: будує замок із піску
4733 | temperature (noun): the degree of hotness or coldness of something | loc: температура
  EN TS: His temperature is sky high!
  ua TS: У нього температура до небес!
  EN FS: His temperature is very low!
  ua FS: У нього дуже низька температура!
  EN TP: taking his temperature
  ua TP: міряє йому температуру
  EN FP: the temperature outside
  ua FP: температура надворі
4734 | care (noun): the work of looking after someone | loc: догляд
  EN TS: She is taking care of her.
  ua TS: Вона дбає про неї — справжній догляд.
  EN FS: She is taking care of a dog.
  ua FS: Вона дбає про собаку — справжній догляд.
  EN TP: loving care on the sofa
  ua TP: турботливий догляд на дивані
  EN FP: skin care in the bathroom
  ua FP: догляд за шкірою у ванній
4735 | punch (noun): a blow with the fist | loc: удар кулаком
  EN TS: She is throwing punches.
  ua TS: Вона завдає ударів кулаком.
  EN FS: She is blocking punches.
  ua FS: Вона блокує удари кулаком.
  EN TP: punches into a padded shield
  ua TP: удари кулаком у лапу
  EN FP: a bowl of fruit punch
  ua FP: чаша фруктового пуншу
4736 | army (noun): a large group of soldiers who fight together | loc: армія
  EN TS: The army is training on sand.
  ua TS: Армія тренується на піску.
  EN FS: The army is training in snow.
  ua FS: Армія тренується в снігу.
  EN TP: an army training together
  ua TP: армія тренується разом
  EN FP: an army at war
  ua FP: армія на війні
4737 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: глечик
  EN TS: She's pouring from a jug.
  ua TS: Вона наливає з глечика.
  EN FS: She's pouring from a bottle.
  ua FS: Вона наливає з пляшки.
  EN TP: pouring water from a jug
  ua TP: наливає воду з глечика
  EN FP: a jug of orange juice
  ua FP: глечик апельсинового соку
4738 | everywhere (adverb): in all places, all around you | loc: всюди
  EN TS: Her clothes are everywhere!
  ua TS: Її одяг всюди!
  EN FS: Her books are everywhere!
  ua FS: Її книжки всюди!
  EN TP: clothes everywhere
  ua TP: одяг всюди
  EN FP: passports everywhere
  ua FP: паспорти всюди
4739 | discover (verb): to discover that something is there | loc: виявити
  EN TS: She discovered a huge diamond!
  ua TS: Вона виявила величезний діамант!
  EN FS: She discovered a huge ring!
  ua FS: Вона виявила величезний перстень!
  EN TP: discovering a hidden diamond
  ua TP: виявляє схований діамант
  EN FP: discovering a new country
  ua FP: відкриває нову країну
4740 | wound (noun): a cut or open injury on the skin | loc: рана
  EN TS: He will clean the wound now.
  ua TS: Зараз він промиє рану.
  EN FS: He will clean the bike now.
  ua FS: Зараз він помиє велосипед.
  EN TP: cleaning a bleeding wound
  ua TP: промиває рану, що кровить
  EN FP: a wound on the face
  ua FP: рана на обличчі
4741 | to pull (verb): to cause something to move by pulling | loc: тягнути | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is pulling a fish out!
  ua TS: Він тягне рибу з води!
  EN FS: He is pulling a boot out!
  ua FS: Він тягне черевик з води!
  EN TP: to pull up a fish
  ua TP: тягнути рибу
  EN FP: to pull a boat ashore
  ua FP: тягнути човен на берег
4742 | strong (adjective): having more power or strength than normal | loc: сильний
  EN TS: She is strong on the ropes!
  ua TS: Вона така сильна на канатах!
  EN FS: She is strong on the bike!
  ua FS: Вона така сильна на велосипеді!
  EN TP: strong arms and legs
  ua TP: сильні руки й ноги
  EN FP: a strong cup of coffee
  ua FP: міцна чашка кави
4743 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: політ
  EN TS: Juice! Best flight ever!
  ua TS: Сік! Найкращий політ у житті!
  EN FS: Pizza! Best flight ever!
  ua FS: Піца! Найкращий політ у житті!
  EN TP: a flight at sunset
  ua TP: політ на заході сонця
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  ua FP: сходовий проліт
4744 | to relax (verb): to rest and let your body go calm | loc: розслаблятися
  EN TS: She is relaxing on the water.
  ua TS: Вона розслабляється на воді.
  EN FS: She is relaxing on the sand.
  ua FS: Вона розслабляється на піску.
  EN TP: to relax on salty water
  ua TP: розслаблятися на солоній воді
  EN FP: relaxing in a hot bath
  ua FP: розслабляється в гарячій ванні
4745 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: текти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The river flows past pebbles.
  ua TS: Річка тече повз гальку.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  ua FS: Річка тече повз будинки.
  EN TP: water flowing downstream
  ua TP: вода тече вниз за течією
  EN FP: water flowing from a tap
  ua FP: вода тече з крана
4746 | photographer (noun): someone who takes photos as their job | loc: фотограф
  EN TS: The jet is flying over the photographers!
  ua TS: Літак пролітає над фотографами!
  EN FS: The bird is flying over the photographers!
  ua FS: Птах пролітає над фотографами!
  EN TP: photographers at the runway
  ua TP: фотографи біля злітної смуги
  EN FP: photographers at a wedding
  ua FP: фотографи на весіллі
4747 | seagull (noun): a big white and grey bird that lives by the sea | loc: чайка
  EN TS: The seagulls want his bread!
  ua TS: Чайки хочуть його хліб!
  EN FS: The seagulls want his hat!
  ua FS: Чайки хочуть його капелюх!
  EN TP: seagulls around a ferry
  ua TP: чайки навколо порома
  EN FP: seagulls on a beach
  ua FP: чайки на пляжі
4748 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: хмара
  EN TS: Only clouds below the wing.
  ua TS: Під крилом лише хмари.
  EN FS: Only mountains below the wing.
  ua FS: Під крилом лише гори.
  EN TP: clouds below a plane
  ua TP: хмари під літаком
  EN FP: clouds over the sea
  ua FP: хмари над морем
4749 | formation (noun): a group of people arranged as one unit | loc: формація
  EN TS: They're falling in formation!
  ua TS: Вони падають у формації!
  EN FS: They're swimming in formation!
  ua FS: Вони пливуть у формації!
  EN TP: skydivers in a ring formation
  ua TP: парашутисти у формації кола
  EN FP: a football team formation
  ua FP: формація футбольної команди
4750 | clothes (noun): the clothing you wear | loc: одяг
  EN TS: She built a castle of clothes.
  ua TS: Вона збудувала замок з одягу.
  EN FS: She built a castle of books.
  ua FS: Вона збудувала замок з книжок.
  EN TP: folding clean clothes
  ua TP: складає чистий одяг
  EN FP: washing dirty clothes
  ua FP: пере брудний одяг
4751 | guide (noun): a person who shows tourists around a place | loc: екскурсовод
  EN TS: Guide with a yellow umbrella.
  ua TS: Екскурсовод із жовтою парасолькою.
  EN FS: Guide with a red umbrella.
  ua FS: Екскурсовод із червоною парасолькою.
  EN TP: a guide with an umbrella
  ua TP: екскурсовод із парасолькою
  EN FP: a guide in a museum
  ua FP: екскурсовод у музеї
4752 | failure (noun): an act that fails | loc: невдача
  EN TS: Failure! The oven did it.
  ua TS: Невдача! Це все духовка.
  EN FS: Success! The oven did it.
  ua FS: Успіх! Це все духовка.
  EN TP: a baking failure
  ua TP: кулінарна невдача
  EN FP: a failure in maths
  ua FP: невдача з математики
4753 | forgive (verb): to stop blaming someone and forgive them | loc: пробачити
  EN TS: Plot twist: he forgave him.
  ua TS: Несподіваний поворот: він його пробачив.
  EN FS: Plot twist: he ignored him.
  ua FS: Несподіваний поворот: він його проігнорував.
  EN TP: forgiving an old friend
  ua TP: пробачає старому другові
  EN FP: forgiving his little brother
  ua FP: пробачає молодшому братові
4754 | protest (verb): to say words that show you disagree | loc: протестувати
  EN TS: He is protesting: "Not me!"
  ua TS: Він протестує: «Це не я!»
  EN FS: She is protesting: "Not me!"
  ua FS: Вона протестує: «Це не я!»
  EN TP: protesting to the referee
  ua TP: протестує перед суддею
  EN FP: protesting in the street
  ua FP: протестує на вулиці
4755 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: перелом
  EN TS: The X-ray shows a hand fracture.
  ua TS: Рентген показує перелом руки.
  EN FS: The X-ray shows a leg fracture.
  ua FS: Рентген показує перелом ноги.
  EN TP: a fracture on an X-ray
  ua TP: перелом на рентгені
  EN FP: a fracture in a leg
  ua FP: перелом ноги
4756 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Франція
  EN TS: A baguette on a bike? That is France!
  ua TS: Багет на велику? Це Франція!
  EN FS: A pizza on a bike? That is France!
  ua FS: Піца на велику? Це Франція!
  EN TP: cycling in France
  ua TP: на велосипеді по Франції
  EN FP: skiing in France
  ua FP: на лижах у Франції
4757 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: свобода
  EN TS: Summer freedom at last!
  ua TS: Літня свобода нарешті!
  EN FS: Winter freedom at last!
  ua FS: Зимова свобода нарешті!
  EN TP: freedom on an open road
  ua TP: свобода на відкритій дорозі
  EN FP: freedom in a big city
  ua FP: свобода у великому місті
4758 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: повний
  EN TS: Now the fridge is full, bro!
  ua TS: Тепер холодильник повний, брате!
  EN FS: Now the fridge is empty, bro!
  ua FS: Тепер холодильник порожній, брате!
  EN TP: a fridge full of food
  ua TP: холодильник, повний їжі
  EN FP: a full washing machine
  ua FP: повна пральна машина
4759 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: пекар
  EN TS: The baker is talking into a baguette.
  ua TS: Пекар говорить у багет.
  EN FS: The baker is talking into a croissant.
  ua FS: Пекар говорить у круасан.
  EN TP: a baker with a baguette
  ua TP: пекар із багетом
  EN FP: a baker making pizza
  ua FP: пекар робить піцу
4760 | share (verb): to use one thing together with someone | loc: ділитися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are sharing an ice cream.
  ua TS: Вони діляться морозивом.
  EN FS: They are sharing a pizza.
  ua FS: Вони діляться піцою.
  EN TP: to share an ice cream
  ua TP: ділитися морозивом
  EN FP: to share a tram ticket
  ua FP: ділитися квитком на трамвай
4761 | bacon (noun): salted and smoked meat from a pig's back | loc: бекон
  EN TS: Bacon on a frozen lake!
  ua TS: Бекон на замерзлому озері!
  EN FS: Bacon on a sandy beach!
  ua FS: Бекон на піщаному пляжі!
  EN TP: frying bacon on the ice
  ua TP: смажить бекон на льоду
  EN FP: bacon in a sandwich
  ua FP: бекон у сендвічі
4762 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: галерея
  EN TS: He loves this gallery!
  ua TS: Він обожнює цю галерею!
  EN FS: He hates this gallery!
  ua FS: Він ненавидить цю галерею!
  EN TP: a big art gallery
  ua TP: велика художня галерея
  EN FP: a gallery full of cars
  ua FP: галерея, повна машин
4763 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: геймер
  EN TS: These gamers are going crazy!
  ua TS: Ці геймери шаленіють!
  EN FS: These gamers are all asleep!
  ua FS: Ці геймери всі сплять!
  EN TP: gamers in an arena
  ua TP: геймери на арені
  EN FP: a gamer in a classroom
  ua FP: геймер у класі
4764 | sofa (noun): a long soft seat for more than one person | loc: диван
  EN TS: She is going wild on the sofa.
  ua TS: Вона відривається на дивані.
  EN FS: She is going wild on the bed.
  ua FS: Вона відривається на ліжку.
  EN TP: jumping on the sofa
  ua TP: стрибає на дивані
  EN FP: sleeping on the sofa
  ua FP: спить на дивані
4765 | greenhouse (noun): a building with glass walls and roof | loc: теплиця
  EN TS: The garden features a greenhouse.
  ua TS: У саду є теплиця.
  EN FS: The garden features a swimming pool.
  ua FS: У саду є басейн.
  EN TP: a small glass greenhouse
  ua TP: маленька скляна теплиця
  EN FP: a big plastic greenhouse
  ua FP: велика пластикова теплиця
4766 | garden (verb): to work in the garden | loc: садівничати
  EN TS: She loves to garden.
  ua TS: Вона обожнює садівничати.
  EN FS: She loves to swim.
  ua FS: Вона обожнює плавати.
  EN TP: to garden among flowers
  ua TP: садівничати серед квітів
  EN FP: to garden in the rain
  ua FP: садівничати під дощем
4767 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: садівник
  EN TS: The gardener has big shears.
  ua TS: У садівника великі ножиці.
  EN FS: The gardener has a big axe.
  ua FS: У садівника велика сокира.
  EN TP: a gardener with shears
  ua TP: садівник із садовими ножицями
  EN FP: a gardener with a hose
  ua FP: садівник зі шлангом
4768 | card (noun): a small piece of stiff paper used for games | loc: карта
  EN TS: He has the winning cards.
  ua TS: У нього виграшні карти.
  EN FS: He has the winning dice.
  ua FS: У нього виграшні кубики.
  EN TP: two playing cards
  ua TP: дві гральні карти
  EN FP: a birthday card
  ua FP: листівка на день народження
4769 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: паркан
  EN TS: She is standing by a fence.
  ua TS: Вона стоїть біля паркану.
  EN FS: She is sitting on a fence.
  ua FS: Вона сидить на паркані.
  EN TP: a fence along the rim
  ua TP: паркан уздовж краю
  EN FP: a fence around a garden
  ua FP: паркан навколо саду
4770 | boarding (noun): getting on a plane or ship as a passenger | loc: посадка
  EN TS: Boarding is now in progress.
  ua TS: Зараз триває посадка.
  EN FS: Landing is now in progress.
  ua FS: Зараз триває приземлення.
  EN TP: boarding through a jet bridge
  ua TP: посадка через телетрап
  EN FP: boarding at a train station
  ua FP: посадка на потяг
4771 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: палац
  EN TS: Gate, gate, gate... palace!
  ua TS: Ворота, ворота, ворота... палац!
  EN FS: Gate, gate, gate... church!
  ua FS: Ворота, ворота, ворота... церква!
  EN TP: a gate to a palace
  ua TP: ворота до палацу
  EN FP: a palace in a city
  ua FP: палац у місті
4772 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: зграя
  EN TS: A huge flock is in the sky.
  ua TS: Величезна зграя в небі.
  EN FS: A huge flock is on the water.
  ua FS: Величезна зграя на воді.
  EN TP: a flock of starlings
  ua TP: зграя шпаків
  EN FP: a flock on a lake
  ua FP: зграя на озері
4773 | gathering (noun): a group of people together in one place | loc: зібрання
  EN TS: The music started a gathering.
  ua TS: Через музику почалося зібрання.
  EN FS: The music started a fight.
  ua FS: Через музику почалася бійка.
  EN TP: a gathering around a busker
  ua TP: зібрання довкола музиканта
  EN FP: a family gathering at home
  ua FP: сімейне зібрання вдома
4774 | generation (noun): all the people of about the same age alive now | loc: покоління
  EN TS: Every generation is laughing under the apple tree.
  ua TS: Кожне покоління сміється під яблунею.
  EN FS: Every generation is laughing under the palm tree.
  ua FS: Кожне покоління сміється під пальмою.
  EN TP: generations in a garden
  ua TP: покоління в саду
  EN FP: generations at a dinner table
  ua FP: покоління за обіднім столом
4775 | newborn (adjective): born a very short time ago | loc: новонароджений
  EN TS: The newborn has four fans already.
  ua TS: У новонародженого вже четверо фанатів.
  EN FS: The newborn has two fans already.
  ua FS: У новонародженого вже двоє фанатів.
  EN TP: a newborn baby asleep
  ua TP: новонароджене немовля спить
  EN FP: a newborn lamb
  ua FP: новонароджене ягня
4776 | polite (adjective): showing good manners towards other people | loc: ввічливий
  EN TS: So polite: he is lifting his hat.
  ua TS: Такий ввічливий: він піднімає капелюха.
  EN FS: So polite: he is lifting his cane.
  ua FS: Такий ввічливий: він піднімає тростину.
  EN TP: a polite greeting
  ua TP: ввічливе привітання
  EN FP: a polite letter
  ua FP: ввічливий лист
4777 | helpful (adjective): providing useful help to other people | loc: послужливий
  EN TS: He is helpful to everyone.
  ua TS: Він послужливий з усіма.
  EN FS: He is rude to everyone.
  ua FS: Він грубий з усіма.
  EN TP: a helpful old gentleman
  ua TP: послужливий літній джентльмен
  EN FP: a helpful young waiter
  ua FP: послужливий молодий офіціант
4778 | workshop (noun): a small workplace where things are made | loc: майстерня
  EN TS: This workshop produces clocks.
  ua TS: Ця майстерня виготовляє годинники.
  EN FS: This workshop produces shoes.
  ua FS: Ця майстерня виготовляє взуття.
  EN TP: a small clock workshop
  ua TP: маленька годинникова майстерня
  EN FP: a small writing workshop
  ua FP: маленька письменницька майстерня
4779 | germany (noun): the country in central Europe, capital Berlin | loc: Німеччина
  EN TS: He is having fun in Germany!
  ua TS: Він розважається в Німеччині!
  EN FS: She is having fun in Germany!
  ua FS: Вона розважається в Німеччині!
  EN TP: a trip around Germany
  ua TP: подорож Німеччиною
  EN FP: a job in Germany
  ua FP: робота в Німеччині
4780 | separate (adjective): independent, not joined to each other | loc: окремий
  EN TS: They are leaving through separate doors.
  ua TS: Вони йдуть через окремі двері.
  EN FS: They are leaving through the same door.
  ua FS: Вони йдуть через одні й ті самі двері.
  EN TP: two separate doors
  ua TP: двоє окремих дверей
  EN FP: two separate tables
  ua FP: два окремі столи
4781 | marry (verb): to take someone as your husband or wife | loc: одружитися
  EN TS: She is marrying him!
  ua TS: Вона одружується з ним!
  EN FS: She is leaving him!
  ua FS: Вона кидає його!
  EN TP: to marry in a garden
  ua TP: одружитися в саду
  EN FP: to marry on a beach
  ua FP: одружитися на пляжі
4782 | playground (noun): an open area where people go to play | loc: ігровий майданчик
  EN TS: She owns the playground!
  ua TS: Вона королева ігрового майданчика!
  EN FS: She owns the classroom!
  ua FS: Вона королева класу!
  EN TP: playing in the playground
  ua TP: граються на ігровому майданчику
  EN FP: an empty playground
  ua FP: порожній ігровий майданчик
4783 | couple (noun): two people in a romantic relationship | loc: пара
  EN TS: The couple is covered in cake!
  ua TS: Пара вся в торті!
  EN FS: The couple is covered in mud!
  ua FS: Пара вся в багнюці!
  EN TP: a couple with cake faces
  ua TP: пара з обличчями в торті
  EN FP: a couple on a bike
  ua FP: пара на велосипеді
4784 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: давати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is giving her a present.
  ua TS: Він дає їй подарунок.
  EN FS: He is giving her a phone.
  ua FS: Він дає їй телефон.
  EN TP: giving a wrapped present
  ua TP: дає загорнутий подарунок
  EN FP: giving a big speech
  ua FP: виголошує велику промову
4785 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: тераса
  EN TS: Cheers on the terrace!
  ua TS: Будьмо — на терасі!
  EN FS: Cheers in the kitchen!
  ua FS: Будьмо — на кухні!
  EN TP: juice on a sunny terrace
  ua TP: сік на сонячній терасі
  EN FP: a rooftop terrace party
  ua FP: вечірка на терасі на даху
4786 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: виблискувати
  EN TS: The sand is sparkling blue!
  ua TS: Пісок виблискує синім!
  EN FS: The sand is sparkling red!
  ua FS: Пісок виблискує червоним!
  EN TP: sand sparkling at night
  ua TP: пісок виблискує вночі
  EN FP: sand sparkling in the sun
  ua FP: пісок виблискує на сонці
4787 | valuable (adjective): worth a great amount of money or value | loc: цінний
  EN TS: This pan is very valuable.
  ua TS: Ця миска дуже цінна.
  EN FS: This pan is totally empty.
  ua FS: Ця миска зовсім порожня.
  EN TP: a valuable pan of gold
  ua TP: цінна миска із золотом
  EN FP: a valuable old painting
  ua FP: цінна стара картина
4788 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: шокований
  EN TS: Salon gossip. Everyone is shocked.
  ua TS: Плітки в салоні. Усі шоковані.
  EN FS: Salon gossip. Everyone is bored.
  ua FS: Плітки в салоні. Усім нудно.
  EN TP: shocked by salon gossip
  ua TP: шокована плітками в салоні
  EN FP: shocked by the price
  ua FP: шокована ціною
4789 | authority (noun): the power to give orders and make decisions | loc: влада
  EN TS: She has full authority.
  ua TS: У неї вся повнота влади.
  EN FS: He has full authority.
  ua FS: У нього вся повнота влади.
  EN TP: a woman with authority
  ua TP: жінка з владою
  EN FP: authority over an army
  ua FP: влада над армією
4790 | conflict (noun): an open clash between two opposing sides | loc: конфлікт
  EN TS: Conflict at the big table, and papers are flying!
  ua TS: Конфлікт за великим столом, і папери літають!
  EN FS: Peace at the big table, and papers are flying!
  ua FS: Мир за великим столом, і папери літають!
  EN TP: a conflict at the table
  ua TP: конфлікт за столом
  EN FP: a conflict on the street
  ua FP: конфлікт на вулиці
4791 | papers (noun): official writing that gives you information | loc: документи
  EN TS: She is setting down papers.
  ua TS: Вона кладе документи.
  EN FS: She is setting down flowers.
  ua FS: Вона кладе квіти.
  EN TP: a folder of papers
  ua TP: тека з документами
  EN FP: papers on the floor
  ua FP: документи на підлозі
4792 | to plant (verb): to put seeds or young plants into the ground | loc: садити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are planting flowers.
  ua TS: Вони садять квіти.
  EN FS: They are picking flowers.
  ua FS: Вони зривають квіти.
  EN TP: planting a young flower
  ua TP: садять молоду квітку
  EN FP: planting a flag
  ua FP: встановлюють прапор
4793 | sand (verb): to rub something smooth with sandpaper | loc: шліфувати
  EN TS: They are sanding a birdhouse.
  ua TS: Вони шліфують шпаківню.
  EN FS: They are painting a birdhouse.
  ua FS: Вони фарбують шпаківню.
  EN TP: sanding a wooden roof
  ua TP: шліфують дерев'яний дах
  EN FP: sanding a wooden floor
  ua FP: шліфують дерев'яну підлогу
4794 | grandmother (noun): the mother of your mother or father | loc: бабуся
  EN TS: Grandmother's cookies win.
  ua TS: Печиво від бабусі — топ.
  EN FS: Grandmother's pizza wins.
  ua FS: Піца від бабусі — топ.
  EN TP: cookies from grandmother
  ua TP: печиво від бабусі
  EN FP: cookies from a shop
  ua FP: печиво з магазину
4795 | to bake (verb): to cook food by putting it in a hot oven | loc: пекти
  EN TS: She baked cookies. Best day!
  ua TS: Вона спекла печиво. Найкращий день!
  EN FS: She baked a pie. Best day!
  ua FS: Вона спекла пиріг. Найкращий день!
  EN TP: baked chocolate cookies
  ua TP: спечене шоколадне печиво
  EN FP: baked apple pies
  ua FP: спечені яблучні пироги
4796 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: балансувати
  EN TS: He is balancing two cards. Careful!
  ua TS: Він балансує двома картами. Обережно!
  EN FS: He is balancing two cups. Careful!
  ua FS: Він балансує двома чашками. Обережно!
  EN TP: balancing playing cards
  ua TP: балансує гральними картами
  EN FP: balancing on one leg
  ua FP: балансує на одній нозі
4797 | little (adjective): below average in number or quantity | loc: мало | translator note: loc мало means too little; kept it in TS, used трохи in phrases
  EN TS: He adds just a little cheese.
  ua TS: Він додає мало сиру, зовсім трішки.
  EN FS: He adds just a little sauce.
  ua FS: Він додає мало соусу, зовсім трішки.
  EN TP: a little extra cheese
  ua TP: ще трохи сиру
  EN FP: a little extra pepper
  ua FP: ще трохи перцю
4798 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: храм
  EN TS: She is walking to a temple.
  ua TS: Вона йде до храму.
  EN FS: She is walking to a church.
  ua FS: Вона йде до церкви.
  EN TP: an old hilltop temple
  ua TP: старий храм на пагорбі
  EN FP: an old hilltop castle
  ua FP: старий замок на пагорбі
4799 | tie (verb): to fasten something with a cord or string | loc: зав'язати
  EN TS: Tying a bow tie? Nervous work!
  ua TS: Зав'язати метелика? Нервова робота!
  EN FS: Tying his shoes? Nervous work!
  ua FS: Зав'язати шнурки? Нервова робота!
  EN TP: tying a black bow tie
  ua TP: зав'язує чорного метелика
  EN FP: tying up the suitcase
  ua FP: перев'язує валізу
4800 | groom (noun): the man who is getting married at a wedding | loc: наречений
  EN TS: The groom is so nervous!
  ua TS: Наречений так нервує!
  EN FS: The bride is so nervous!
  ua FS: Наречена так нервує!
  EN TP: a nervous groom
  ua TP: знервований наречений
  EN FP: a groom feeding a horse
  ua FP: наречений годує коня
4801 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: високий
  EN TS: This sunflower is so tall!
  ua TS: Цей соняшник такий високий!
  EN FS: This cactus is so tall!
  ua FS: Цей кактус такий високий!
  EN TP: a tall sunflower
  ua TP: високий соняшник
  EN FP: a tall tree
  ua FP: високе дерево
4802 | museum (noun): a building for displaying valuable old objects | loc: музей
  EN TS: This guard is the museum boss.
  ua TS: Цей охоронець — бос музею.
  EN FS: This cook is the museum boss.
  ua FS: Цей кухар — бос музею.
  EN TP: a museum guard
  ua TP: охоронець музею
  EN FP: a guard at a bank
  ua FP: охоронець у банку
4803 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: букет
  EN TS: She brought a bouquet.
  ua TS: Вона принесла букет.
  EN FS: She brought a cake.
  ua FS: Вона принесла торт.
  EN TP: a bouquet for the host
  ua TP: букет для господині
  EN FP: a bouquet for a bride
  ua FP: букет для нареченої
4804 | tour (verb): to make a trip round a place to see it | loc: оглядати
  EN TS: They are touring a blue town.
  ua TS: Вони оглядають синє місто.
  EN FS: They are touring a red town.
  ua FS: Вони оглядають червоне місто.
  EN TP: touring a blue town
  ua TP: оглядають синє місто
  EN FP: touring with a rock band
  ua FP: гастролюють з рок-гуртом
4805 | church (noun): a place where Christians go to worship | loc: церква
  EN TS: He is pointing at a church.
  ua TS: Він показує на церкву.
  EN FS: He is pointing at a boat.
  ua FS: Він показує на човен.
  EN TP: a domed church
  ua TP: церква з куполами
  EN FP: a wooden church
  ua FP: дерев'яна церква
4806 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: купол
  EN TS: A dome is behind his book.
  ua TS: За його книжкою купол.
  EN FS: A crane is behind his book.
  ua FS: За його книжкою кран.
  EN TP: a dome on the skyline
  ua TP: купол на тлі міста
  EN FP: a dome tent for camping
  ua FP: намет-купол для кемпінгу
4807 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: помаранчевий
  EN TS: He is wearing an orange top.
  ua TS: На ньому помаранчевий топ.
  EN FS: He is wearing an orange cap.
  ua FS: На ньому помаранчева кепка.
  EN TP: an orange sports top
  ua TP: помаранчева спортивна футболка
  EN FP: an orange sports car
  ua FP: помаранчеве спортивне авто
4808 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: коса
  EN TS: The stylist is making a braid.
  ua TS: Стилістка плете косу.
  EN FS: The stylist is making a bun.
  ua FS: Стилістка робить гульку.
  EN TP: weaving a long braid
  ua TP: плете довгу косу
  EN FP: cutting a long braid
  ua FP: відрізає довгу косу
4809 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: коридор
  EN TS: It's rush hour in the corridor.
  ua TS: У коридорі година пік.
  EN FS: It's rush hour in the bathroom.
  ua FS: У ванній година пік.
  EN TP: a corridor full of shoes
  ua TP: коридор, повний взуття
  EN FP: a long hotel corridor
  ua FP: довгий готельний коридор
4810 | post (noun): a piece of timber fixed upright in the ground | loc: стовп
  EN TS: He is hammering a post in.
  ua TS: Він забиває стовп.
  EN FS: He is hammering a nail in.
  ua FS: Він забиває цвях.
  EN TP: a post in the ground
  ua TP: стовп у землі
  EN FP: a post on social media
  ua FP: пост у соцмережах
4811 | teammate (noun): someone who is on the same team as you | loc: товариш по команді
  EN TS: The teammates are hyped up.
  ua TS: Товариші по команді на підйомі.
  EN FS: The teammates are fighting.
  ua FS: Товариші по команді сваряться.
  EN TP: hands in with teammates
  ua TP: товариші по команді разом
  EN FP: arguing with teammates
  ua FP: сварка з командою
4812 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: охайний
  EN TS: His wardrobe is super tidy.
  ua TS: Його шафа капець яка охайна.
  EN FS: His wardrobe is super messy.
  ua FS: Його шафа капець яка неохайна.
  EN TP: a tidy row of shirts
  ua TP: охайний ряд сорочок
  EN FP: a tidy pile of shoes
  ua FP: охайна купка взуття
4813 | harbour (noun): a sheltered place on the coast for boats | loc: гавань
  EN TS: The harbour is busy.
  ua TS: Гавань повна життя.
  EN FS: The harbour is empty.
  ua FS: Гавань порожня.
  EN TP: a busy harbour at sunrise
  ua TP: жвава гавань на світанку
  EN FP: a harbour in a storm
  ua FP: гавань під час шторму
4814 | to pick (verb): to take leaves or fruit off a plant | loc: зривати
  EN TS: The team is picking tomatoes.
  ua TS: Команда зриває помідори.
  EN FS: The team is picking apples.
  ua FS: Команда зриває яблука.
  EN TP: picking a red tomato
  ua TP: зриває червоний помідор
  EN FP: picking a red apple
  ua FP: зриває червоне яблуко
4815 | rub (verb): to move your hand over something with pressure | loc: терти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Office stress: rubbing her temples.
  ua TS: Офісний стрес: вона тре скроні.
  EN FS: Office stress: rubbing her feet.
  ua FS: Офісний стрес: вона тре ступні.
  EN TP: rubbing her temples
  ua TP: тре скроні
  EN FP: rubbing her hands together
  ua FP: тре руки
4816 | heart (noun): the muscular organ in your chest | loc: серце
  EN TS: Her heart is racing!
  ua TS: Її серце шалено калатає!
  EN FS: Her heart is resting!
  ua FS: Її серце б'ється спокійно!
  EN TP: a hand over the heart
  ua TP: рука на серці
  EN FP: a heart on her shirt
  ua FP: серце на її футболці
4817 | drought (noun): a long time with a shortage of rain | loc: посуха
  EN TS: Even the tree melts in this drought.
  ua TS: У цю посуху тане навіть дерево.
  EN FS: Even the dog melts in this drought.
  ua FS: У цю посуху тане навіть пес.
  EN TP: a drought with cracked ground
  ua TP: посуха і потріскана земля
  EN FP: the end of a drought
  ua FP: кінець посухи
4818 | heel (noun): the rounded back part of the foot | loc: п'ята
  EN TS: Spikes under the heel? Crazy!
  ua TS: Шипи під п'ятою? Божевілля!
  EN FS: Wheels under the heel? Crazy!
  ua FS: Колеса під п'ятою? Божевілля!
  EN TP: a spike under the heel
  ua TP: шип під п'ятою
  EN FP: the heel of a shoe
  ua FP: підбор туфлі
4819 | grateful (adjective): feeling or showing thanks to someone | loc: вдячний
  EN TS: The old woman is grateful.
  ua TS: Літня жінка вдячна.
  EN FS: The old man is grateful.
  ua FS: Літній чоловік вдячний.
  EN TP: grateful for the umbrella
  ua TP: вдячна за парасольку
  EN FP: grateful for the taxi
  ua FP: вдячна за таксі
4820 | same (adjective): the same one, not a different one | loc: однаковий
  EN TS: They have the same dress!
  ua TS: У них однакові сукні!
  EN FS: They have the same bag!
  ua FS: У них однакові сумки!
  EN TP: the same patterned dress
  ua TP: однакова сукня з візерунком
  EN FP: the same shoes
  ua FP: однакові туфлі
4821 | sunset (noun): the evening moment when the sun goes down | loc: захід сонця
  EN TS: Sunset pizza is here!
  ua TS: Піца на заході сонця вже тут!
  EN FS: Sunset sushi is here!
  ua FS: Суші на заході сонця вже тут!
  EN TP: pizza delivery at sunset
  ua TP: доставка піци на заході сонця
  EN FP: a sunset over the mountains
  ua FP: захід сонця над горами
4822 | message (noun): a short written or spoken communication | loc: повідомлення
  EN TS: The message made her so happy.
  ua TS: Повідомлення її так потішило.
  EN FS: The message made her so sad.
  ua FS: Повідомлення її так засмутило.
  EN TP: reading a happy message
  ua TP: читає радісне повідомлення
  EN FP: a message on the fridge
  ua FP: повідомлення на холодильнику
4823 | depth (noun): how far downward something goes | loc: глибина
  EN TS: He is diving to a great depth.
  ua TS: Він пірнає на велику глибину.
  EN FS: He is diving to a small depth.
  ua FS: Він пірнає на малу глибину.
  EN TP: diving to a great depth
  ua TP: пірнання на велику глибину
  EN FP: the depth of a pool
  ua FP: глибина басейну
4824 | pretend (verb): to make believe something is real | loc: удавати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her horse is fake, but she pretends well.
  ua TS: Кінь у неї несправжній, але вдає вона чудово.
  EN FS: Her horse is fake, but she swims well.
  ua FS: Кінь у неї несправжній, але плаває вона чудово.
  EN TP: pretending to ride a horse
  ua TP: удає, що їде верхи
  EN FP: pretending to be asleep
  ua FP: удає, що спить
4825 | to wipe (verb): to clean a surface by rubbing it with a cloth | loc: витирати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Worktop wiped. Kitchen done.
  ua TS: Стільницю витерто. Кухня готова.
  EN FS: Window wiped. Kitchen done.
  ua FS: Вікно витерто. Кухня готова.
  EN TP: wiping the white worktop
  ua TP: витирає білу стільницю
  EN FP: wiping away tears
  ua FP: витирає сльози
4826 | dam (noun): a barrier built to hold back water | loc: гребля
  EN TS: The dam is overflowing!
  ua TS: Вода переливається через греблю!
  EN FS: The pool is overflowing!
  ua FS: Вода переливається через край басейну!
  EN TP: an overflowing dam
  ua TP: переповнена гребля
  EN FP: a dry dam in summer
  ua FP: суха гребля влітку
4827 | paint (noun): a coloured substance you put on a surface | loc: фарба
  EN TS: This orange paint is thick.
  ua TS: Ця помаранчева фарба густа.
  EN FS: This blue paint is thick.
  ua FS: Ця синя фарба густа.
  EN TP: a thick slab of paint
  ua TP: густий шмат фарби
  EN FP: a fresh coat of paint
  ua FP: свіжий шар фарби
4828 | wall (noun): a flat side of a room, taller than its thickness | loc: стіна
  EN TS: Half the wall is green now.
  ua TS: Пів стіни вже зелене.
  EN FS: Half the wall is blue now.
  ua FS: Пів стіни вже синє.
  EN TP: a half-green wall
  ua TP: наполовину зелена стіна
  EN FP: a green garden wall
  ua FP: зелена садова стіна
4829 | chip (noun): a small piece broken off something | loc: уламок | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc уламок does not fit paint chips; used лусочки
  EN TS: Paint chips are falling off.
  ua TS: Лусочки фарби відпадають.
  EN FS: Paint drops are falling off.
  ua FS: Краплі фарби відпадають.
  EN TP: chips of old paint
  ua TP: лусочки старої фарби
  EN FP: chips of old glass
  ua FP: уламки старого скла
4830 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: плавати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Two divers are swimming up.
  ua TS: Двоє дайверів пливуть угору.
  EN FS: Three divers are swimming up.
  ua FS: Троє дайверів пливуть угору.
  EN TP: swimming up to the surface
  ua TP: пливе до поверхні
  EN FP: to swim across the river
  ua FP: плавати через річку
4831 | hit (noun): a successful stroke of the bat in baseball | loc: удар
  EN TS: What a big hit!
  ua TS: Оце так удар!
  EN FS: What a big miss!
  ua FS: Оце так промах!
  EN TP: a hit off a tee
  ua TP: удар із підставки
  EN FP: a hit on the radio
  ua FP: хіт на радіо
4832 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: хребет
  EN TS: A thin ridge above the clouds.
  ua TS: Тонкий хребет над хмарами.
  EN FS: A wide ridge above the clouds.
  ua FS: Широкий хребет над хмарами.
  EN TP: a thin snow ridge
  ua TP: тонкий сніговий хребет
  EN FP: a ridge of green hills
  ua FP: хребет зелених пагорбів
4833 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: узбережжя
  EN TS: He is skating along the coast like it is nothing.
  ua TS: Він мчить на скейті вздовж узбережжя, наче це дрібниця.
  EN FS: He is cycling along the coast like it is nothing.
  ua FS: Він мчить на велосипеді вздовж узбережжя, наче це дрібниця.
  EN TP: skating down the coast road
  ua TP: на скейті вздовж узбережжя
  EN FP: sailing along the coast
  ua FP: під вітрилом уздовж узбережжя
4834 | toy (noun): a thing designed to be played with | loc: іграшка
  EN TS: This toy battle is epic!
  ua TS: Ця битва іграшок — епічна!
  EN FS: This card battle is epic!
  ua FS: Ця битва карток — епічна!
  EN TP: a spinning toy
  ua TP: іграшка-дзиґа
  EN FP: a toy car
  ua FP: іграшкова машинка
4835 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: місто
  EN TS: A chase is on in the city!
  ua TS: У місті погоня!
  EN FS: A parade is on in the city!
  ua FS: У місті парад!
  EN TP: a city street at night
  ua TP: вулиця міста вночі
  EN FP: a city street at noon
  ua FP: вулиця міста опівдні
4836 | saw (verb): to cut something using a saw | loc: пиляти
  EN TS: He is sawing out a bear.
  ua TS: Він пиляє колоду — виходить ведмідь.
  EN FS: He is sawing out a horse.
  ua FS: Він пиляє колоду — виходить кінь.
  EN TP: sawing a bear from wood
  ua TP: пиляє дерев'яного ведмедя
  EN FP: sawing a plank in half
  ua FP: пиляє дошку навпіл
4837 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: стіл
  EN TS: The table is full of food.
  ua TS: Стіл повний їжі.
  EN FS: The table is full of books.
  ua FS: Стіл повний книжок.
  EN TP: a table full of food
  ua TP: стіл, повний їжі
  EN FP: a table full of games
  ua FP: стіл, повний ігор
4838 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: кидати
  EN TS: She is throwing a ball.
  ua TS: Вона кидає м'яч.
  EN FS: She is kicking a ball.
  ua FS: Вона б'є м'яч ногою.
  EN TP: to throw a beach ball
  ua TP: кидати пляжний м'яч
  EN FP: to throw a party
  ua FP: влаштувати вечірку
4839 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: рухатися | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc рухатися is intransitive; used рухати/зрушити
  EN TS: He can move a car alone!
  ua TS: Він сам може зрушити машину!
  EN FS: He can move a bus alone!
  ua FS: Він сам може зрушити автобус!
  EN TP: moving heavy things
  ua TP: рухає важкі речі
  EN FP: moving to a new city
  ua FP: переїзд до нового міста
4840 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: ховатися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They hid for a surprise!
  ua TS: Вони сховалися заради сюрпризу!
  EN FS: They hid from a dog!
  ua FS: Вони сховалися від собаки!
  EN TP: hiding behind the sofa
  ua TP: ховається за диваном
  EN FP: hiding under the bed
  ua FP: ховається під ліжком
4841 | key (noun): a small metal device that turns in a lock | loc: ключ
  EN TS: She found the key! Finally!
  ua TS: Вона знайшла ключ! Нарешті!
  EN FS: She found the phone! Finally!
  ua FS: Вона знайшла телефон! Нарешті!
  EN TP: finding a small key
  ua TP: знаходить маленький ключ
  EN FP: losing a small key
  ua FP: губить маленький ключ
4842 | to work (verb): to do physical or mental work for a purpose | loc: працювати
  EN TS: He is working on an old car.
  ua TS: Він працює над старою машиною.
  EN FS: He is working on an old bike.
  ua FS: Він працює над старим велосипедом.
  EN TP: working on a car engine
  ua TP: працює над двигуном авто
  EN FP: working in an office
  ua FP: працює в офісі
4843 | structure (noun): a thing built from many parts | loc: конструкція
  EN TS: That is one big wooden structure!
  ua TS: Оце так велика дерев'яна конструкція!
  EN FS: That is one big metal structure!
  ua FS: Оце так велика металева конструкція!
  EN TP: a wooden house structure
  ua TP: дерев'яна конструкція будинку
  EN FP: the structure of a sentence
  ua FP: структура речення
4844 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: половина
  EN TS: She cut the pumpkin in half.
  ua TS: Вона розрізала гарбуз на дві половини.
  EN FS: She cut the cake in half.
  ua FS: Вона розрізала торт на дві половини.
  EN TP: a pumpkin cut in half
  ua TP: гарбуз, розрізаний на половини
  EN FP: half a pumpkin pie
  ua FP: половина гарбузового пирога
4845 | cloth (noun): material made by weaving or knitting fibers | loc: тканина
  EN TS: Hands are sewing the cloth.
  ua TS: Руки шиють тканину.
  EN FS: Hands are cutting the cloth.
  ua FS: Руки ріжуть тканину.
  EN TP: stitching the cloth
  ua TP: прошиває тканину
  EN FP: wiping with a cloth
  ua FP: витирає ганчіркою
4846 | iron (verb): to press clothes smooth with a hot iron | loc: прасувати
  EN TS: Ironing done: one flat sheet.
  ua TS: Випрасувано: одне рівне простирадло.
  EN FS: Ironing done: one flat towel.
  ua FS: Випрасувано: один рівний рушник.
  EN TP: ironing a white sheet
  ua TP: прасує біле простирадло
  EN FP: ironing out a problem
  ua FP: залагоджує проблему
4847 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: підлога
  EN TS: What a clean floor!
  ua TS: Яка чиста підлога!
  EN FS: What a dirty floor!
  ua FS: Яка брудна підлога!
  EN TP: mopping the floor
  ua TP: миє підлогу
  EN FP: painting the floor
  ua FP: фарбує підлогу
4848 | grow (verb): to get bigger gradually, the way a plant does | loc: рости
  EN TS: Look what she grew: a pumpkin!
  ua TS: Дивіться, що в неї виросло: гарбуз!
  EN FS: Look what she grew: a melon!
  ua FS: Дивіться, що в неї виросло: диня!
  EN TP: growing a big pumpkin
  ua TP: у неї росте великий гарбуз
  EN FP: growing a long beard
  ua FP: відрощує довгу бороду
4849 | summer (noun): the warmest season of the year | loc: літо
  EN TS: Summer: water for everyone!
  ua TS: Літо: вода для всіх!
  EN FS: Summer: cake for everyone!
  ua FS: Літо: торт для всіх!
  EN TP: a summer garden sprinkler
  ua TP: дощувач у саду влітку
  EN FP: a summer beach day
  ua FP: літній день на пляжі
4850 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: фотоапарат
  EN TS: He is pointing a camera at us!
  ua TS: Він наводить на нас фотоапарат!
  EN FS: He is pointing a phone at us!
  ua FS: Він наводить на нас телефон!
  EN TP: a camera on a tripod
  ua TP: фотоапарат на штативі
  EN FP: a camera in a shop
  ua FP: фотоапарат у магазині
4851 | ancient (adjective): very old, from thousands of years ago | loc: стародавній
  EN TS: She found an ancient tablet!
  ua TS: Вона знайшла стародавню табличку!
  EN FS: She found an ancient sword!
  ua FS: Вона знайшла стародавній меч!
  EN TP: an ancient stone tablet
  ua TP: стародавня кам'яна табличка
  EN FP: an ancient ship
  ua FP: стародавній корабель
4852 | gear (noun): a toothed wheel that turns inside a machine | loc: шестерня
  EN TS: Huge gears at the end!
  ua TS: Величезні шестерні в кінці!
  EN FS: Tiny gears at the end!
  ua FS: Крихітні шестерні в кінці!
  EN TP: huge interlocking gears
  ua TP: величезні зчеплені шестерні
  EN FP: bike gears
  ua FP: шестерні велосипеда
4853 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: крихітний
  EN TS: That cog is super tiny.
  ua TS: Ця шестерінка суперкрихітна.
  EN FS: That screw is super tiny.
  ua FS: Цей гвинтик суперкрихітний.
  EN TP: a tiny brass cog
  ua TP: крихітна латунна шестерінка
  EN FP: a tiny kitchen
  ua FP: крихітна кухня
4854 | solve (verb): to find the solution to a problem | loc: розв'язати
  EN TS: He is solving a huge problem!
  ua TS: Він розв'язує величезну задачу!
  EN FS: He is solving a tiny problem!
  ua FS: Він розв'язує крихітну задачу!
  EN TP: solving maths on a board
  ua TP: розв'язує задачу на дошці
  EN FP: solving a crime
  ua FP: розкриває злочин
4855 | remember (verb): to recall something from your memory | loc: пам'ятати
  EN TS: He wants to remember every word in the world.
  ua TS: Він хоче пам'ятати кожне слово у світі.
  EN FS: He wants to forget every word in the world.
  ua FS: Він хоче забути кожне слово у світі.
  EN TP: remembering words on cards
  ua TP: пам'ятати слова з карток
  EN FP: remembering a birthday
  ua FP: пам'ятати про день народження
4856 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: учитель
  EN TS: The teacher is behind a wall of paper.
  ua TS: Учитель за стіною з паперів.
  EN FS: The teacher is behind a wall of books.
  ua FS: Учитель за стіною з книжок.
  EN TP: a teacher marking papers
  ua TP: учитель перевіряє роботи
  EN FP: a teacher reading a book
  ua FP: учитель читає книжку
4857 | worker (noun): a person who works at a job | loc: робітник
  EN TS: The worker shook it, and now it works!
  ua TS: Робітник потрусив його — і тепер працює!
  EN FS: The worker kicked it, and now it works!
  ua FS: Робітник копнув його — і тепер працює!
  EN TP: a worker with a scanner
  ua TP: робітник зі сканером
  EN FP: a worker with a hammer
  ua FP: робітник із молотком
4858 | spiral (noun): a shape that curves round and round from a centre | loc: спіраль
  EN TS: His domino spiral is enormous!
  ua TS: Його спіраль із доміно величезна!
  EN FS: His domino tower is enormous!
  ua FS: Його вежа з доміно величезна!
  EN TP: a spiral of dominoes
  ua TP: спіраль із доміно
  EN FP: a spiral notebook
  ua FP: блокнот на спіралі
4859 | piece (noun): a separate part of something bigger | loc: шматок
  EN TS: The pieces took over the room.
  ua TS: Шматочки пазла захопили кімнату.
  EN FS: The toys took over the room.
  ua FS: Іграшки захопили кімнату.
  EN TP: fitting puzzle pieces
  ua TP: складає шматочки пазла
  EN FP: a piece of cake
  ua FP: шматок торта
4860 | bubble (noun): a small ball of gas inside a liquid | loc: бульбашка
  EN TS: The tablet makes bubbles.
  ua TS: Таблетка утворює бульбашки.
  EN FS: The tablet makes sparks.
  ua FS: Таблетка утворює іскри.
  EN TP: bubbles in a glass
  ua TP: бульбашки в склянці
  EN FP: a bubble of chewing gum
  ua FP: бульбашка з жуйки
4861 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: слухати
  EN TS: Shh, she is listening!
  ua TS: Тихо, вона слухає!
  EN FS: Shh, she is sleeping!
  ua FS: Тихо, вона спить!
  EN TP: listening to a bird
  ua TP: слухає пташку
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  ua FP: слухає вчителя
4862 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: вибирати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She can't choose a pumpkin.
  ua TS: Вона не може вибрати гарбуз.
  EN FS: She can't choose a hat.
  ua FS: Вона не може вибрати капелюх.
  EN TP: choosing between two apples
  ua TP: вибирає між двома яблуками
  EN FP: choosing between two dresses
  ua FP: вибирає між двома сукнями
4863 | plan (noun): a series of steps to reach a goal | loc: план
  EN TS: Her plan fills the whole wall.
  ua TS: Її план займає всю стіну.
  EN FS: Her plan fills the whole desk.
  ua FS: Її план займає весь стіл.
  EN TP: a plan on the wall
  ua TP: план на стіні
  EN FP: a plan for a house
  ua FP: план будинку
4864 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: форма
  EN TS: The band is in uniform!
  ua TS: Оркестр у формі!
  EN FS: The band is in pyjamas!
  ua FS: Оркестр у піжамах!
  EN TP: a band in uniform
  ua TP: оркестр у формі
  EN FP: a school uniform
  ua FP: шкільна форма
4865 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: лінза
  EN TS: His camera has a long lens.
  ua TS: У його фотоапарата довга лінза.
  EN FS: His camera has a short lens.
  ua FS: У його фотоапарата коротка лінза.
  EN TP: a long camera lens
  ua TP: довга лінза фотоапарата
  EN FP: a lens in her glasses
  ua FP: лінза в її окулярах
4866 | drone (noun): a small flying machine with a camera | loc: дрон
  EN TS: A drone is hovering low. Nice shot!
  ua TS: Дрон зависає низько. Класний кадр!
  EN FS: A bird is hovering low. Nice shot!
  ua FS: Птах зависає низько. Класний кадр!
  EN TP: a drone over the grass
  ua TP: дрон над травою
  EN FP: a drone in the studio
  ua FP: дрон у студії
4867 | thumb (noun): the short thick finger on your hand | loc: великий палець
  EN TS: She is giving two thumbs up.
  ua TS: Вона показує два великі пальці вгору.
  EN FS: She is giving two thumbs down.
  ua FS: Вона показує два великі пальці вниз.
  EN TP: two thumbs up
  ua TP: два великі пальці вгору
  EN FP: a thumb on guitar strings
  ua FP: великий палець на струнах
4868 | program (verb): to write a computer program | loc: програмувати
  EN TS: They programmed it. It works!
  ua TS: Вони це запрограмували. Працює!
  EN FS: They programmed it. It broke!
  ua FS: Вони це запрограмували. Зламалося!
  EN TP: programming a new app
  ua TP: програмує новий застосунок
  EN FP: programming a washing machine
  ua FP: програмує пральну машину
4869 | design (noun): working out the form of something in a sketch | loc: дизайн
  EN TS: Design is her whole life.
  ua TS: Дизайн — усе її життя.
  EN FS: Football is her whole life.
  ua FS: Футбол — усе її життя.
  EN TP: a logo design
  ua TP: дизайн логотипа
  EN FP: a tattoo design
  ua FP: дизайн тату
4870 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: піна
  EN TS: His face is covered in foam.
  ua TS: Його обличчя вкрите піною.
  EN FS: His face is covered in mud.
  ua FS: Його обличчя вкрите багнюкою.
  EN TP: foam on his cheek
  ua TP: піна на щоці
  EN FP: foam on a beer
  ua FP: піна на пиві
4871 | registration (noun): the act of signing up or enrolling | loc: реєстрація
  EN TS: The registration queue is endless.
  ua TS: Черга на реєстрацію нескінченна.
  EN FS: The registration queue is empty.
  ua FS: Черга на реєстрацію порожня.
  EN TP: a registration desk
  ua TP: стійка реєстрації
  EN FP: a car registration plate
  ua FP: реєстрація авто
4872 | rating (noun): a score showing the value of something | loc: оцінка
  EN TS: Such a "strict" rating: always five stars.
  ua TS: Така «сувора» оцінка: завжди п'ять зірок.
  EN FS: Such a "strict" rating: always one star.
  ua FS: Така «сувора» оцінка: завжди одна зірка.
  EN TP: a five-star rating
  ua TP: оцінка п'ять зірок
  EN FP: a one-star rating
  ua FP: оцінка одна зірка
4873 | study (noun): using your mind to learn a subject by reading | loc: навчання
  EN TS: She is lost in study.
  ua TS: Вона загубилася в навчанні.
  EN FS: She is lost in a forest.
  ua FS: Вона загубилася в лісі.
  EN TP: deep in study
  ua TP: занурена в навчання
  EN FP: a medical study
  ua FP: медичне дослідження
4874 | traffic light (noun): the lights that tell cars to stop and go | loc: світлофор
  EN TS: She stopped at a traffic light.
  ua TS: Вона зупинилася на світлофорі.
  EN FS: She stopped at a busy gas station.
  ua FS: Вона зупинилася на жвавій заправці.
  EN TP: stopped at a traffic light
  ua TP: зупинка на світлофорі
  EN FP: a red traffic light
  ua FP: червоний сигнал світлофора
4875 | truck (noun): a big road vehicle for hauling things | loc: вантажівка
  EN TS: The team is loading the truck.
  ua TS: Команда вантажить вантажівку.
  EN FS: The team is loading the boat.
  ua FS: Команда вантажить човен.
  EN TP: a truck full of boxes
  ua TP: вантажівка, повна коробок
  EN FP: a truck full of sand
  ua FP: вантажівка, повна піску
4876 | smile (verb): to spread your lips to show you are pleased | loc: усміхатися
  EN TS: Rain, but she is smiling.
  ua TS: Дощ, а вона усміхається.
  EN FS: Rain, but she is crying.
  ua FS: Дощ, а вона плаче.
  EN TP: smiling at a puppy
  ua TP: усміхається цуценяті
  EN FP: smiling at the bus driver
  ua FP: усміхається водієві автобуса
4877 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: сидіти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Now everybody is sitting!
  ua TS: Тепер усі сидять!
  EN FS: Now everybody is standing!
  ua FS: Тепер усі стоять!
  EN TP: sitting in a full hall
  ua TP: сидять у повній залі
  EN FP: sitting in an empty bus
  ua FP: сидить у порожньому автобусі
4878 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: пірс
  EN TS: This guy is diving off the pier.
  ua TS: Цей чувак стрибає з пірсу.
  EN FS: This guy is diving off the boat.
  ua FS: Цей чувак стрибає з човна.
  EN TP: diving off a wooden pier
  ua TP: стрибок з дерев'яного пірсу
  EN FP: fishing off a wooden pier
  ua FP: риболовля з дерев'яного пірсу
4879 | competition (noun): an event where a winner is chosen | loc: змагання
  EN TS: She is lifting a car in this competition!
  ua TS: На цих змаганнях вона піднімає авто!
  EN FS: She is lifting a bike in this competition!
  ua FS: На цих змаганнях вона піднімає велосипед!
  EN TP: a strongwoman competition
  ua TP: змагання для жінок-силачок
  EN FP: a singing competition on TV
  ua FP: співочий конкурс на ТБ
4880 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: пляшка
  EN TS: A water bottle off the roof? Wild.
  ua TS: Пляшка води з даху? Жесть.
  EN FS: A chair off the roof? Totally wild.
  ua FS: Стілець з даху? Повна жесть.
  EN TP: a big water bottle
  ua TP: велика пляшка води
  EN FP: a baby's milk bottle
  ua FP: дитяча пляшечка з молоком
4881 | bus (noun): a vehicle that carries many passengers | loc: автобус
  EN TS: People are pushing a bus!
  ua TS: Люди штовхають автобус!
  EN FS: People are pushing a train!
  ua FS: Люди штовхають потяг!
  EN TP: pushing a city bus
  ua TP: штовхають міський автобус
  EN FP: catching a city bus
  ua FP: встигають на міський автобус
4882 | aircraft (noun): a vehicle that can fly | loc: літальний апарат
  EN TS: They are pulling an aircraft!
  ua TS: Вони тягнуть літальний апарат!
  EN FS: They are pulling a truck!
  ua FS: Вони тягнуть вантажівку!
  EN TP: pulling a huge aircraft
  ua TP: тягнуть величезний літальний апарат
  EN FP: an aircraft taking off
  ua FP: літак злітає
4883 | reveal (verb): to make something visible for everyone to see | loc: відкрити
  EN TS: The doors reveal green hills.
  ua TS: Двері відкривають зелені пагорби.
  EN FS: The doors reveal a blue sea.
  ua FS: Двері відкривають синє море.
  EN TP: revealing a green valley
  ua TP: відкриває зелену долину
  EN FP: revealing a secret
  ua FP: відкриває таємницю
4884 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: показувати
  EN TS: Everybody is pointing up!
  ua TS: Усі показують угору!
  EN FS: Everybody is pointing down!
  ua FS: Усі показують униз!
  EN TP: pointing at the sky
  ua TP: показує на небо
  EN FP: pointing at a map
  ua FP: показує на карту
4885 | street (noun): a road in a town lined with buildings | loc: вулиця
  EN TS: They are going up the street.
  ua TS: Вони йдуть угору вулицею.
  EN FS: They are going up the stairs.
  ua FS: Вони йдуть угору сходами.
  EN TP: a sunny cobbled street
  ua TP: сонячна бруківчаста вулиця
  EN FP: a busy shopping street
  ua FP: жвава торгова вулиця
4886 | steep (adjective): rising or falling very sharply, almost straight | loc: крутий
  EN TS: The path is so steep.
  ua TS: Стежка така крута.
  EN FS: The path is so flat.
  ua FS: Стежка така пласка.
  EN TP: a steep grassy path
  ua TP: крута трав'яниста стежка
  EN FP: a steep price
  ua FP: крута ціна
4887 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: вузький
  EN TS: Whoa, this path is narrow!
  ua TS: Ого, ця стежка вузька!
  EN FS: Whoa, this path is wide!
  ua FS: Ого, ця стежка широка!
  EN TP: a narrow canyon path
  ua TP: вузька стежка в каньйоні
  EN FP: a narrow shop door
  ua FP: вузькі двері магазину
4888 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: босий
  EN TS: Everyone is walking barefoot!
  ua TS: Усі йдуть босі!
  EN FS: Everyone is running barefoot!
  ua FS: Усі біжать босі!
  EN TP: walking barefoot on the sand
  ua TP: іде босий по піску
  EN FP: barefoot on hot stones
  ua FP: босі на гарячому камінні
4889 | circular (adjective): having the shape of a circle | loc: круглий
  EN TS: The platform is circular.
  ua TS: Платформа кругла.
  EN FS: The platform is square.
  ua FS: Платформа квадратна.
  EN TP: a circular white platform
  ua TP: кругла біла платформа
  EN FP: a circular letter
  ua FP: циркулярний лист
4890 | circle (verb): to travel around something in a ring | loc: кружляти
  EN TS: Everyone is circling the top.
  ua TS: Усі кружляють довкола дзиґи.
  EN FS: Everyone is circling the tree.
  ua FS: Усі кружляють довкола дерева.
  EN TP: circling a spinning top
  ua TP: кружляють довкола дзиґи
  EN FP: circling a football
  ua FP: кружляють довкола м'яча
4891 | campus (noun): the grounds and buildings of a university | loc: кампус
  EN TS: The whole campus is leaning!
  ua TS: Весь кампус нахиляється!
  EN FS: The whole campus is jumping!
  ua FS: Весь кампус стрибає!
  EN TP: students on the campus lawn
  ua TP: студенти на газоні кампусу
  EN FP: a campus in the snow
  ua FP: кампус у снігу
4892 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: шорти
  EN TS: Those swim shorts are so fast!
  ua TS: Ці плавальні шорти такі швидкі!
  EN FS: Those swim fins are so fast!
  ua FS: Ці ласти такі швидкі!
  EN TP: colourful swim shorts
  ua TP: яскраві плавальні шорти
  EN FP: shorts for football
  ua FP: шорти для футболу
4893 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: переповнений
  EN TS: Crowded to the very top!
  ua TS: Переповнений до самого верху!
  EN FS: Crowded only at the bottom!
  ua FS: Переповнений лише внизу!
  EN TP: a crowded baseball stadium
  ua TP: переповнений бейсбольний стадіон
  EN FP: a crowded bus at night
  ua FP: переповнений нічний автобус
4894 | still (adjective): completely without movement, like flat water | loc: нерухомий
  EN TS: Everyone is still. Very normal.
  ua TS: Усі нерухомі. Цілком нормально.
  EN FS: Everyone is dancing. Very normal.
  ua FS: Усі танцюють. Цілком нормально.
  EN TP: still students in a hall
  ua TP: нерухомі студенти в залі
  EN FP: still water in a lake
  ua FP: нерухома вода в озері
4895 | opposite (adjective): directly across from each other | loc: протилежний
  EN TS: They stand on opposite sides.
  ua TS: Вони стоять на протилежних боках.
  EN FS: They stand on the same side.
  ua FS: Вони стоять на одному боці.
  EN TP: on opposite sides
  ua TP: на протилежних боках
  EN FP: the opposite direction
  ua FP: протилежний напрямок
4896 | shadow (noun): the dark shape you make by blocking light | loc: тінь
  EN TS: Everyone has a long shadow!
  ua TS: У всіх довгі тіні!
  EN FS: Everyone has a long scarf!
  ua FS: У всіх довгі шарфи!
  EN TP: long shadows on stones
  ua TP: довгі тіні на камінні
  EN FP: shadows on a wall
  ua FP: тіні на стіні
4897 | join (verb): to become part of a group | loc: приєднатися
  EN TS: Everyone is joining the hug!
  ua TS: Усі приєднуються до обіймів!
  EN FS: Everyone is joining the dance!
  ua FS: Усі приєднуються до танцю!
  EN TP: joining a group hug
  ua TP: приєднується до групових обіймів
  EN FP: joining a dance class
  ua FP: записується на танці
4898 | panel (noun): a flat sheet that forms part of something | loc: панель
  EN TS: They are fitting glass panels.
  ua TS: Вони встановлюють скляні панелі.
  EN FS: They are fitting wood panels.
  ua FS: Вони встановлюють дерев'яні панелі.
  EN TP: fitting glass panels
  ua TP: встановлюють скляні панелі
  EN FP: cleaning glass panels
  ua FP: миють скляні панелі
4899 | enormous (adjective): extremely big | loc: величезний
  EN TS: That radish is enormous, dude!
  ua TS: Ця редька величезна, чувак!
  EN FS: That melon is enormous, dude!
  ua FS: Ця диня величезна, чувак!
  EN TP: an enormous white radish
  ua TP: величезна біла редька
  EN FP: an enormous pumpkin
  ua FP: величезний гарбуз
4900 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: стос
  EN TS: The tall stack fell over!
  ua TS: Високий стос упав!
  EN FS: The tall tree fell over!
  ua FS: Високе дерево впало!
  EN TP: a tall stack of pallets
  ua TP: високий стос піддонів
  EN FP: a stack of pancakes
  ua FP: стос млинців
4901 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: синій
  EN TS: Blue sea, blue sky, big dive.
  ua TS: Синє море, синє небо, крутий стрибок.
  EN FS: Blue pool, blue sky, big dive.
  ua FS: Синій басейн, синє небо, крутий стрибок.
  EN TP: diving into blue water
  ua TP: стрибок у синю воду
  EN FP: diving into a blue pool
  ua FP: стрибок у синій басейн
4902 | submarine (noun): a warship that travels under water | loc: підводний човен
  EN TS: A submarine, then a whale. Swim faster!
  ua TS: Підводний човен, потім кит. Пливи швидше!
  EN FS: A submarine, then a shark. Swim faster!
  ua FS: Підводний човен, потім акула. Пливи швидше!
  EN TP: a submarine in a lake
  ua TP: підводний човен в озері
  EN FP: a submarine in a harbour
  ua FP: підводний човен у гавані
4903 | crowd (verb): to gather closely in large numbers | loc: юрмитися | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everyone is crowding the plaza. Why?
  ua TS: Усі юрмляться на площі. Чому?
  EN FS: Cars are crowding the plaza. Why?
  ua FS: Машини юрмляться на площі. Чому?
  EN TP: crowding into the square
  ua TP: юрмляться на площі
  EN FP: crowding around a stage
  ua FP: юрмляться біля сцени
